Narrator Yes, little weed – good night to you too.
The Malcolm Wilson Rally is based in the town of Cockermouth and features a selection of stages in the surrounding forests of Greystokes, Grizedale, Comb and Hobcarton. The first car departs the ceremonial start at 9am and is due back at the champagne finish at around 3:30pm on Saturday afternoon.
Blue moon,
Get well soon!
With the popularity of the UFC the trend has been combat sports. MMA and Jiu Jitsu lead the way in the popularity contest. Throughout this trend, Aikido has been ridiculed by MMA /BJJ practitioners and passed off as a bullshit art. Visions of hakamas flying through the air thrown by flashy and non-practical techniques make Aikido very questionable in the eyes of many. Unfortunately, I tend to agree with some of these individuals. I say this having trained in Aikido for half of my martial arts career of (28 years). I have also extensively trained in Kung Fu, Judo, BJJ, Judo, Kali, Siriat and various other combat arts. This being said, Aikido concepts and fundamentals still remain my core.
My favourite part was the dungeon and its puzzles. I expect to have fun with that.
This happened many years ago. I was in Florida for a work conference, and the incident happened on the flight home. I settled into my seat, and a very attractive young lady took the seat next to me. If I was around 30, she had to have been in her early 20's, and she was the whole package - cute face, bright smile, lithe little body.
"Well, hello to you, too," said the doll, standing up in a cloud of dust and peering over the edge of the trunk at Sam. "Where are your manners? Sure, I'm a bit rough looking - but I have been locked up for eight years. You wouldn't look like a beauty queen either."
Put some potato starch or cornflour (cornstarch) onto a plate.
I want you to patiently read this offer. I am Mrs.Aminata Abdullahi, the wife to the deceased former Head of Delegation to the World Bank in West Africa. My husband was the linkman between the Organization for Petroleum Exporting Countries – OPEC and the petroleum sector in a West African country. He also attend OPEC meetings constantly in Geneva before his death caused by cardiac arrest in our home town.
*I warn you: this takes a lot of prep, because the ingredients have to be cooked in different ways. However, you can make a lot and eat it for days, exactly like I did*
My day started out with having my brother over for coffee for a couple of hours. He hasn't been around for quite some time, so it was a real treat. And then all the papers... Today has been a very good day.
19. City Of Tiny Lights (10:07)
But the most important difference between that movie and my life is that I recognize that if I am not doing what I need to do to be happy, I’m not going to sit around feeling victimized by Tyler’s happiness. I am going to be inspired by Tyler’s ability to turn his dreams into reality, and I will keep searching for the thing that will give me the same deep satisfaction that he gets from building this house.
Sheer torture, I tell you. I'm being punished. I'm having karmic retribution for my fairly common cases of road rage. I'm in purgatory to make up for insensitive comments to my crazy mother (she IS as nutty as a fruit bat, I assure you). I can't say "it's not fair" as I deserve worse, but... I NEED THAT FILL, DANG IT!
discover textures with the tips of my fingers -
"Wrong. Not her mother."
A good audience – Be a good fan when you are waiting for your time to perform. Hush now. Be the audience that you would want.
C. Our Mouths Were Made For Edifying
I'm a smart nurse. I earned very good grades in nursing school and passed my Boards with the minimum amount of questions (75). I know a lot of stuff about the body, about patients, and about disease processes. My challenge now is to take everything I know and turn it in to things I can do.
Her expression's enigmatic and I'd love to know her mind
God is life and in life there is hope. God is our hope. We must thank Him for everything especially the gift of life.
Isopropyl Myristate – See Myristic Acid.
It seems fairly clear that this has been done in the light of celebs like Sienna Miller and Steve Coogan aggressively pursuing their suits against the News of the World. And in a very significant move, Rupert Murdoch is reported to have told a high-ranking news anchorperson that Andy Coulson should “get out from under” his position in Downing Street.
Last year I started a journal that I'd hoped to show the boy later as he grows. This blog has turned into that record of his growth and development (but an excerpt of that journal is included below). I posted two other portions of his birth story last spring that you should read if you haven't. My wife's ordeal that ended up in a five week hospital stay before labor is related in part one, and labor and Alexander Brent Wescott's birth on November 15, 2010, constitutes part two. Romantic stuff.
The last name on the list is Nicklas Bendtner. Since his arrival from FC Copenhagen in 2005, B52’s best season was the last campaign because he featured a lot thanks to rVp’s long injury layoff. This season he has gone down the pecking order because of the kind of formation that Arsenal uses. He was advised to do his groin operation before the World Cup but he resisted, played in the tourney, scored one goal and took the operation that made him miss out on the start of the season. rVp on the other hand injured himself against Blackburn in August so Arsenal had only newbie Marouane Chamakh in the tail end of 2010. The striker that cost the club nothing scored 10 goals in his first 21 appearances but rightly found himself on the bench because rVp came back from injury with goal blood in his mouth and fire in his belly. rVp was World football’s most lethal finisher in January and February with 12 goals to his name. Benzema got close last month or so with 9 goals in 6 games but in at Arsenal there was nothing that Chamakh or Bendtner could do with rVp’s situation. As long as he was fit, he was going to play.
In addition to this, I also add the clove water to my shampoo and conditioner (See post “Getting Back To Your Roots.”).
I have been one busy girl lately. Flat out. But there is a very good reason for it all. Let me fill you in.
rainjacket H&M, shoes Zara, bag MJ, tights Wolford.
Most of the cafes look very uninspiring from the street and it’s only when you venture inside that you can see what you’re dealing with. Right next to the apartment where I’m staying there’s a really unassuming place selling copious amounts of street food with a steady stream of customers. I couldn’t work out where they were all going though and decided the cafe must actually be like the wardrobe in Narnia with a secret door at the back. And pretty much that’s right. Out the back is a small seating area with tables and the ubiquitous tiny plastic seats but what makes this special (apart from the food of course!) is that the whole of the back of the building is built on stilts!
Each charm should have at least 10 charms/dangles with some type of clasp (TH swivel, lobster etc).
I liked that you got to read about the school where the agents were made. I like the fact that Mia who was from the first book was involved in the recruiting of the teens.
The tram service, called De Kusttram, covers almost the entire 65 kilometers of Belgium's coastline, with frequent departures and passing by many delightful sights on the way. One of them is the Art Nouveau tram station De Haan aan Zee, celebrated by the Strubbe brew Trammelantje Den Haene. That beer and its sister, Haanse Witte Den Haene, are brewed for the local butcher/bottle shop, but unfortunately the reviews indicate that the beers may be less than artfully crafted.
May 4th: Sun King Tapping Party
Whether or not you or I ever have this kind of experience, one thing I know for sure - we need a deeper revelation of God's love for us (Eph.1:17-20 AND Eph. 3:16-19) as well as the experiential knowledge that the Holy Spirit abides in us! "To them God has chosen to make known among the Gentiles the glorious riches of this mystery, which is Christ in you, the hope of glory." Col. 1:27 My Bible (NKJ Spirit Filled Bible) has this statement following this verse: "Understand that all hope of real "glory" is in discovering Christ's very life in you." Matthew 28:18-20 "All authority has been given to Me in heaven and on earth. Go therefore and make diciples of all the nations, baptizing them in the name of the Father, and of the Son and of the Holy Spirit, teaching them to obseve all things that I have commanded you; and lo, I am with you always, even to the end of the age." He established His authority and then gave them a job to do. Knowing they would probably be afraid of the "commision" that had just been handed down, He encouraged them with the promise that He would always be with them. This is the same encouragement that we should draw from when we go to pray for people - He has all authority and He is with us (in us)
I've taken to keeping it in my backpack so I can read it on the bus, at work, on the train, while rest during a bike ride, or wherever. It's giving me ideas and I'm starting, ever so slightly, to think about how I cook, don't cook, and could cook. It's making me treat my kitchen differently, more like a studio or workspace, a place to spend time, rather than a place to get in and out of lickety split.
In Maggie Q’s IMDB’s page, the four most prominent projects she is known for are action-oriented Live Free or Die Hard, Mission: Impossible III, Nikita, and Priest.
This is called Business Interruption Insurance.
Leonardo Da Vinci’s Mona Lisa is one of the most famous and most celebrated works of all time. The mastery of the painting lies in its subtle detail, including the faint smile, and Mona Lisa’s distinctive gaze. The work is said to have been commissioned by a gentleman named Francesco del Giocondo, who hired Leonardo to paint a portrait of his wife, and this is why The Mona Lisa is sometimes referred to as La Gioconda. While this is a theory on the origination of the painting, scholars have disagreed throughout the ages about how factual this story really is.
One of the ways you can enter to win is to take this badge and put it on your blog sidebar. It's super easy, because all you have to do is copy the HTML code in that box there. Bam! Done.
In just a few short weeks, 30 carefully selected blogs from our beloved Newfoundland Labrador BlogRoll (of nearly 300 blogs) will be unveiled and for two weeks following, the people (visitors to this site) will vote on their favorites.
nothing wrong with her. Then, she thought a suspicious mole was skin cancer. Again,
to die.
It's not like they're up there stripping, for Pete's sake.
The Blitzkrieg tactic worked quite well in Gulf War II, except where it didn't work so well. American armored troops made rather short work of the trip to Baghdad but a long, lightly defended supply line trailing in the armor's wake left the support troops open to small unit assaults. Did this mean that this version of Blitzkrieg did work and was therefore pragmatic or it didn't really work (or only partially worked) and therefore was not pragmatic? What if our forces were fighting a really determined and competent (although overmatched) enemy that was truly capable of causing major havoc among the armor supply forces? What if the enemy was successful enough to completely strand our powerful yet fuel guzzling tanks by severely hindering their supply? Would Blitzkrieg tactics be proven to be wrong and not therefore pragmatic?
So, taking this QUICK moment to say how much I love him, and how thankful I am that he was born today...only, it wasn't today, it was 21 years ago!
In Three Generations, There Won’t Be Any Democrats.
CFR Director Ann Fudge has close ties to General Electric, which is
Keep up or die, bitches.
It is one of my favorite things to have and always has been. I remember getting SO excited about it when I was little when my mom would say we were getting breakfast for dinner.
Those surveyed face a daily commute of at least 30 minutes each way. The study found strong support for expanding rapid transit to suburban communities.
“It’s very one-sided, even though we don’t have the science to tell us that the sludge is safe,” she said.
Long buried; and though broken, and undefined,
3. New Tech
It meant he was able to buy the £3million house in Holland Park, West London, where he lives with his wife Gaby and their three children round the corner from David Cameron’s house in Notting Hill.
Producer:Derrick Harriott
Our intellectual phase has run its course from the 15th to the 19th century and people are no longer curious because they think that they understand everything, our creative power is lost and intelligence has become mechanical learning.
Everyone sang, but there were no candles...I guess they worried we'd burn down the house!
I'm building a new website for the lodge - very excited about this, Matt killed himself laughing when i phoned him to talk through some stuff, he told me i was turning into a geek :)
10/15/2008 - Columbus, OH - LC Pavilion
Here, I give you... My day in pictures. I'll have you note that my day started at 3 a.m. when a certain little tot fumbled his way to my room and into my bed. I don't have a picture of that though.
Mary at Cardz TV is having another Challenge for Mothers Day. It's called "There's no other like my Mother". You can make a card or project using any cartridge and any colors that you like. I chose the Walk In My Garden Cart. for my card today.
12. Say I love you - and mean it - a lot.
I started reacting severely for comments, long phone calls and then kept cursing myself for the wrong behaviour I had shown towards the receiver of my message. I planned to correct myself each day and then the things would again go the same way. I was not able to track the cause until recently, when I started to test with a cure. It took me long to understand that each human being has a heart that pains and reacts; the one that has equal value as I have for myself.
If I’m being honest, this appointment didn’t result in an earth-shattering epiphany that I could then relay to you lovely, sponge-like readers. However, it also didn’t result in a diagnosis of Bubonic Plague or head-popping-off disease. And if definitely didn’t result in my being thrown from the office by the hairs of my upper lip. Of course it didn’t. Those kinds of things don’t actually happen, despite social anxiety’s insistence otherwise. Nonetheless, I do need these constant, personal reminders and these constant, personal challenges in order to force those realities into my psyche. Slowly but surely, it’s happening.
So I took a big gulp, and made my own. And to my amazement...it worked! I used the auto-shapes in Microsoft Word for the shapes, and hand-embroidered the eyes, nose, & mouth. And here's what my completed monkey finger puppet looked like:
Reading classics is important for so many reasons. They give us all a common back story. So many things are conveyed eloquently and concisely by merely alluding to a character or incident from a classic novel. Reading classics gives us a degree of cultural literacy that helps us relate to others in the world around us.
It matters that you pause for a moment. It matters that you really hear the whirr of your lap-top, or the squeaky wheel as the cyclists passes you. It matters that you smell those tomatoes-on-the-vine and notice their earthy sweetness. It matters that you take a minute to skim your fingertips over your smooth silk shirt.
So, there you have it – my new single & leak roundup for the month of April! So many of these tracks are the first singles off of albums that will be coming out later this year, which has gotten me really hyped up for music throughout the rest of 2012. It is shaping up already to be one of the best years for music in ages! I cannot wait for so many of these records to be released and am beginning to feel like I will be needing to plan all sorts of separate album review posts in the coming months! In any sense, I hope you all picked up some new music to love in this post – I can’t imagine how you wouldn’t find something you like among all of these tracks! While you are enjoying that, I wish you all a beautiful week ahead and a beautiful life!
Flowers: Bazzill Wings Collection
6.) 100% inspection of all goods shipped into America- thus protecting our ports of entry from dangerous materials and shifting the burden and cost to those shipping them to the US. This would also make manufacturing items in the US a bit more favorable.
If there are any questions or suggestion, i'd love to hear them. Just leave me a comment, I will answer and reply them as soon as I can.
Yeah, he just got out of jail. I don’t think he still has a key though.
To Be a Man was transferred from a mono copy of the album and the Lovin' People (apparently) from a stereo copy (at least the MP3s are encoded in stereo). The first album is encoded at VBR-extreme and the 2nd at 192k, and I've made available as one DL HERE. I hope you'll enjoy them.
“What did you say to them tonight when you left?”
I bring all this up because Steven Soderbergh, perhaps uniquely among big-budget Hollywood filmmakers, professes that reality actually doesn’t need too much embellishment to be exciting. His new bio-thriller, Contagion, is the first in his “final tour” of several films stretching into next year before his early retirement from directing to pursue a career as a painter. In creating Contagion, Soderbergh and screenwriter, Scott Z. Burns, have set out to make a film about a deadly pandemic with the honest-to-goodness mission of scaring the pants off of their collective audience, and have decided that the best way to go about doing so is to be as unsparingly honest as possible. Real science and real life, they figured, are strange and fascinating enough that flights of fancy aren’t needed to write good movie material. What this philosophy has produced is a taut, science-fact thriller that will, without fail, turn audiences at least temporarily into raging germophobes. I think there’s something to this philosophy.
What have been the highs and lows of your week?
If you are debating whether adoption truly makes a difference. If you wonder how adopting one child could possibly do anything to decrease the millions of orphaned children around the world. If you wonder how God could call you to rescue and give a home and be a family to the least of these. If you wonder where the money, time, and energy will come from. I ask you to remember that with our God ALL things are truly possible. God did not leave us as orphans. He rescued us! Adoption matters to our Lord. And, as followers of Christ, if it matters to Him, it should to us as well.
Thirdly, it’s been seven years since he’s had an outbreak, and he still hasn’t had the blood test done to find out if it’s HSV1 or HSV2. It is, of course, likely HSV2, since it manifested genitally, but the point is his lack of responsibility around the entire issue. Something, by the way, he became very angry, accusatory, withdrawn, callous, and condescending about. That was the first time I saw the monster beneath the mask, but I explained it away, telling myself he was feeling ashamed and allowing my love for him to take a nurturing stance, an accepting one. This is an example of how my compassion becomes dangerous to me.
This was a good opportunity for us to work on position words, so I added in “top, bottom and middle” at the beginning of each line. Other ideas for vocabulary labeling are:
Another favorite quote: "Having a baby is like getting a tattoo on your face." You have to be fully committed. I must've laughed for a full 5 min. If only every parent brought the same kind of commitment to a parent/child relationship than it takes to ink the forehead. (I already know if I had a tattoo on my forehead it would say RELAX backwards, so that I could remind myself to take it easy every time I looked in the mirror. Either that or permanent eye-liner. Or the Weezer symbol: "=w=")
whenever you have plants that you care about, you'll naturally have pests of various kinds. a garden is no exception.
I love Bob. I mean, in a “I’m very happily married and he’s really not my type” sort of way.
So Friday I am wearing my new Felix tee and walking in downtown Ithaca, I am not kidding here, and a lady stops her car and sez "I love your tee, esp. the back!". Later me and the missus were at our favorite ratty bar and the bartender is like "awesome tee man!". I love my new Felix the Cat shirt so much, which Missus Buttercup gave me for Easter (and I happen to be wearing today) that I had to buy a second (which arrived today!)and you can get one for yerself!!!!!!!!
But saying all that it is a worthwhile enterprise and one I am pleased to be part of. We have been doing this now for 8 year and I was in it from the very beginning. We have supported the work our friend Jeremiah does with the aides orphans he has adopted in Keyna and to date we have raised over £56,000 which has helped to feed, clothes and educate the boys. So today I am grateful to be part of this project for Ann who started the whole thing and for her friendship
All in all, I do think that this book's premise does fall a bit flat, however, I am hoping that the series will be able to regain its stride in the next book of the series, "Destined".
The High Court yesterday (London, 30th April) issued orders requiring five internet service providers to block access to The Pirate Bay file sharing site. The five ISPs are Sky, Everything Everywhere, TalkTalk, O2 and Virgin Media.
Looking to next week….
I used to play with a doll much like this one except she didn't have the hat and she had a crew cut.I'm also not so sure she wasn't naked.It was my mums doll from the 1940's and she had given it a trim when she was a child. Sadly one day it went in the bin.
Ken Livingstone’s campaign to regain the London mayoralty faced embarrassment last night after Labour peer Lord Sugar urged voters to reject him. Lord Sugar said that ‘no one’ should vote for Mr Livingstone, despite him being the official Labour candidate.
Here we go on to another week of fun and games and what ever may come up, be it good , bad or indifferent. Last week I got the quail house/chicken coop mostly sided. There a couple of corners to finish. Not looking too bad for a bunch of pallets and some old tin siding. Will work on the inside this week.
I’m feeling recharged, too, from reconnecting with my friends here—my Parisian family. I had lunch with Jo the other day, and we’re going to shake our tails at Rosa Bonheur again next week. I hung out and had fancy cocktails, Chinese take-out and great conversation with Michael the other night. And last night, I had over three hours of non-stop catching up with Mel—and we didn’t nearly touch everything we have to catch up on. (I am so excited for and proud of you, Mel!)
From one unstable person to another... I hope everyone is happy in your head - we're all doing pretty good in mine!
I recently read and loved The Immortal Rules by Julie Kagawa. I also expect my pre-ordered copy to arrive this week. I am eager to share it with my students!
This week when my shipments of Nutrisystem arrived and I unpacked them, I noticed a few dinners and other items that I thought I would never like, therefore I never would have bothered trying.
Moving along... I had my best Michael's experience ever today.
Much has been written about Lincoln’s time in office, possibly more so than any other president in our history. But probably the most debated moment of his presidency was when he issued the Emancipation Proclamation in September of 1862, stating that all slaves in those states still in rebellion were to be free as of January 1st, 1863. This document gave the United States a dual purpose in the war: preserve the Union, and free the slaves. But the question is why Lincoln chose to do this? He had already stated that freeing the slaves was not his intent as President. Why did he change his mind on the subject? Some argue that his sole purpose of making emancipation a war aim was to rob the South of its manpower, since the majority of fortifications and such were built by slave labor. To rob the South of their major work force would cripple them economically. And by making emancipation a war aim, it would also keep European interests out of the war.
This city isn’t like any other
cool rain-fragrant wind sighing the pines, when
Designer Christian Audigier, who designs the Ed Hardy brand,
It was done brilliantly by the British armed forces and really within a pretty short space of time, a relatively small force was able to subdue the rebels and produce some order and everything that has flown for Sierra Leone since then has come from that intervention.
And then you have the gall to claim that Obama demonizes them?
"This layout is adorable! Thanks for sharing your great talent with us."
There is no death do us part
Granted, this probably isn’t quite the solution Marx had in mind. Odds are the notion of cardiovascular exercise was more theoretical back then than any talk about dialectical materialism. Really, though, it makes perfect sense. Ask anyone who runs why they do it, and they’ll respond with some nonsensical babble about how cathartic it is, how running clears and relaxes the mind, etc. Where exactly does this fabled “runner’s high” come from though? Released endorphins? Restored chemical balance? Both explanations reek like a bull’s outhouse. No, the real reason you feel good as a result of running is because you’re as unalienated from your labor as you can get, a result probably not applicable to all physical activity. Consider a sport such as crew, which more closely resembles feudalism than anything else: you’ve got your feudal overlord cockswain lounging around in the back of the boat, barking orders at and living high off the exploited labor of a bunch of poor lowly rowing serfs. And most team sports, such as football or baseball, embody a capitalist mode of production in which labor is divided and specialization in specific tasks essential.
I love everyday
My father is Wyle E. Cattlecall. I didn’t apply for the form under the name you list below. I applied for it under his name, Wyle E. Cattlecall.
Run downstairs. Pick it up.
"Infinity is a concept Mom, not a number. What is the largest actual number."--Xander
Sunday morning we awoke (again at 9! I could get used to this!) to a sunshiny outside. We decided to run. We left Charlies apartment and headed to the Manhattan bridge. Before we hit the bridge we stopped to take a picture of this monument. Kind of cool.
6. Zara
With today’s announcement, the drop in price of RON97 petrol was 5.5 per cent, RON92 (8.4 per cent) and diesel (3.1 per cent).
feet cold with water from frosted grass
Some people read this and say, “See? The poor have more faith. So God wants you to be poor.”
On to season 3!
As I said, I haven’t plotted any two books the same way. For Hot Silk, my latest book and the last in the Rodesson’s Daughters trilogy, I used only a long synopsis. For Sin, the first book, I used a long synopsis, a short selling synopsis, mystery spreadsheets, and much on-the-fly outlining. So, while I always thought there was only one approach to plotting that would work for me, I learned that I need to use different techniques. Different stories will demand that you plot different ways.
The Bridport Prize: 250 word flash fiction (you can also enter competitions for short stories and poetry). There’s a Dorset award for the best local winner or runner up
While passage of this law has obvious benefits for the U.S., it has been something Dorgan has been trying to get through for ten years.
NELSON R. Health care workers: few feel the flu shot. Am J Nurs 2004; 104: 24-25.
I just couldn't decide if I should take the pink or the blue one, so I got both. ;) My friend was also very supportive and told me I should get both. (That's what girlfriends are for... LOL!) I also bought some sheer fabric to make a petticoat for my two future 50's style sundresses.
Annie has been curious about Lancôme’s spring products for a while, so she when she shared her invitation to Lancôme’s launch of its new Rouge in Love (lipsticks) and Vernis in Love (nail polish) lines, we were happy to attend the party and report back to her.
I will write my next blog post when I hit 10,000, or when I get fed up with trying. I will also still be keeping an eye on you all.
Mission Statement:
We might be getting a puppy!
It would really help if my husband would get a clue and NOT solicit sex from me when I am hurting this bad over my body's failure. He has never gotten the hint that since Aiden died I have equated sex with making a baby and him asking for it when it is clear it is just for recreation is not helping me. It's not that I don't love him or find him attractive, it's that I don't love ME. I am broken, and fat, and ugly, and useless. I have absolutely no desire to remind myself that sex will not get me what I want most. I just can't separate it the way he can, I wish I could.
Linda and I lived on Lorette for two years, making our early art together – photography, films, collage, video. You can find the detailed chronological history of our artlife on my DTC Art page. Some of our strangest video art ensued from the Lorette house. Videos shot on Lorette include Cheap Grace, No Shirt No Shoes No Service, The Yard, Evidence of Winter and Video Shoes. The Super 8, Passionate Leave, was also shot there.
He spoke about the influence of his “fundamentalist” Christian upbringing, which he said had kept him from supporting gay marriage while younger.
It never seems to end.
Flooding our countries with non-whites, force integrating our communities, encouraging us to blend ourselves out of existence and attacking anyone who opposes these things are imposing conditions of life calculated to bring about the physical destruction of my race. It’s genocide.
A Perfect Example...
The economic redistributionist rejects free enterprise, because it entails risk. Risk is unacceptable to the poor because they cannot, of course, accept financial loss; and is unacceptable for the rich because it creates wealth that (in their view) is not earned. Without risk, there is no opportunity, but for them that is a small price to pay. The end game, though, is to replace an elite based on wealth with one based on political correctness. For them, the goal is not really justice -- it is power for those who toe the party line. Their means is to write more extensive and tighter regulations to discourage anyone from taking any initiative that has not been blessed by their government.
It is estimated that the Cuomo plan would permit drilling in 80-85% of the Marcellus Shale territory in New York State. The formation itself covers a substantial portion of the state but far more of New York would be affected, particularly with a flow of contaminants down through the Finer Lakes and surrounding area into Lake Ontario.
That liquor license
"It's the holy grail of exoplanet research to find a planet around a star orbiting at the right distance so it's not too close where it would lose all its water and boil away, and not too far where it would all freeze," Steven Vogt, an astronomer at the University of California at Santa Cruz, told Space.com. "It's right smack in the habitable zone — there's no question or discussion about it. It's not on the edge, it's right in there."
A quarter of all meat on the British market is now killed according to the non-stun Halal principle despite the fact the Muslim community makes up only three to four per cent of the British population.
#15
It reminded me of a situation from when we were living in Bourke. We were having lunch at our house with a family who'd not long moved to Australia from the highlands of PNG. We looked up and noticed that their 4 year old son was sitting right up at the top of our very tall gum tree, like a baby koala. The first thing I noticed was the wire fence directly underneath the tree, wondering what would happen if he fell. We commented to the parents, "Wow, you can tell he's used to being wild and free and climbing tall trees all the time". "Oh no", they replied, "We don't have any tall trees at all back home, just little scraggly ones."!! Yet he was so confident. And so were they. And he didn't fall.
You say that 4+1=5 but so does 3+2. That's more like it.
Nurminen T. Shift work, fetal development and course of pregnancy. Scand J Work Environ Health 1989; 15: 395-403.
Listen to the chorus mainly peeps…I’m headed to work…and to finally finish my final papers (oh my, I am growing up).
So we proclaim Wednesday, October 20 as the Spina Bifida Kids Worldwide Day of Prayer. We believe in the power of prayer, and we are excited at the prospect of many people praying at the same time for these unborn babies. We moms can make a difference individually and collectively, but that is nothing compared to the change that can come if we have God on our side.
We went to a local car boot sale today. It was eight degrees outside and raining, with a snell breeze. The poor stall-holders were going slowly numb from the feet up. By the time we got home, all I could think about was lighting a fire and falling into an armchair; and I only managed the second part of that plan, so we are still chilly. In my defense for such feeble behaviour, I plead continuing head and neck pain from that stupid concussion; plus I am still finding any social interaction and noise unnaturally wearying. However, on the positive side, I did get myself a couple of useful Kilner jars and a very pretty silver ring, set with citrines and an amethyst, for the grand price of seven quid. Being a magpie for such fripperies I came away well pleased. The boys are happy too: each bought a toy – thus relieving two of their friends’ mothers of some junk – and my husband picked up Kate Winslet for 20p! Well, a video, obviously, but he’s still pretty chuffed.
But beauty of the clouds is that they are temporary. You know at some point the sun will come out and it will shine down on you. And unlike the weather, you can bring the sun out anytime in your life. All you have to do is get off your butt and believe again. You just have to stop thinking and start doing. And in no time that sun will be high in sky lighting up your day and your life.
Blog Design:
CD: Then in October ...?
So cute! Our last stop was culvers! I ordered a small concrete vanilla mixer with strawberries and bananas. They ended up not having bananas…I was soo mad. So the girl gave me a medium instead with extra strawberries and I thought since I didn’t get my pecans at dinner I’ll have them right now…So she added pecans as well. Can you say stuffed like a turkey?! That I was…almost uncomfortablly full actually. yuck. so today I started with coffee and lemon water! Lemon water is great for detox!
I had a fab time having a look around your blogs. There is so much talent out there! It was hard to choose but in the end i have chosen the following girls!
Last night, we were relaxing in the living room. I was trying to describe to her how I had this mental block that I couldn't seem to get through with my latest novel. She kept nodding her head because she understood.
* They knew this galaxy-driven cycle had an exact end-point, measurable by a 25,920-year wobble on any inhabited planet;
On the day that I die,
A propos this, my fellow Salt author Nuala Ni Chonchuir writes an interesting post on the subject of self-promotion by authors. I have come across criticisms on the web of authors who ceaselessly promote their own books, and I have to say that, although I try to do it conscientiously, it still goes against the grain for me, but the fact is that it's now an absolute necessity - most of all for authors with small presses, but also it seems now for most authors with big publishers. I'm sure that Vanessa Gebbie won't mind me replicating here her comment on Nuala's post: I was at a large writer's convention last weekend, with talks from some senior figures in the publishing world - (Get Writing 2010 - and a speaker in question was the MD of Hachette) - it was a wake-up call for anyone in the audience who thought that all you had to do was get a book accepted and then sit back!
The food at Miller Union is Excellent. The staff (waiters and Neal included) were friendly, knowledgeable and attentive. The alcoholic drinks were delicious (Neal made a few concoctions for us that weren't on the menu and I've read that their flavored soda combos are also great).
Why Buy An Android Phone
But the parties were fun. I don’t much like getting sick, and am still sick. I drank two 2-shot margaritas at Jason & Anna’s and was TRAAAAAAAASHED. Got to see a lot of people I hadn’t seen in awhile, including but not limited to: Jason, Anna, Chris Y, Kipp, Casey, Evan, Jesse, Tabbitha, Eli.
You got to hear it
We spent the most of time together...
I know what I'm working on next...(but can't say)...and I do know that I want to write a book and share many many more of my sewing patterns, and even children's books that are brewing in my head, but that is all in the future (the very near future)! Regardless, that journey will be written another day. For now I will enjoy this journey. I will find joy in each day. Otherwise - what is the point of it all? I have come this far and will keep going.
But as Chopra wrote in the foreword: “. . . to limit spirit to inner peace—or even the inner world—was misleading.” Cohen agrees. The big bang set in motion an outer world of choice and relationships and in every moment, every now, we have the power to choose what comes from nothing for the next moment. “. . . when people ask me what the self is, I say that the self is the one who is making the choices,” he writes.
And I just locked down the hotel rooms in MUNICH for Oktoberfest. We'll be staying at a hotel (all the hostels were waaaaaaaay booked up) about 4 subway stops from Oktoberfest. We'll spend the last weekend of Oktoberfest in Munich. This is a guys only trip as well. The only reason we won't be spending more time in Munich is b/c we've set up a warmup trip to Amsterdam. Oh it's real. There's some brewpubs, probably some decent Trappists, some fresh Heineken... aw hell we're staying at the Bulldog Hostel. Oh it's real, it's damn real. If you're wondering how it goes down in Amsterdam, I'm lining up a "different" review of the Heineken faux-brewery for "The Session" post in June. Should be fun.
The couple shares many fond memories of dancing to the music that was performed by Pop Fiction (an 8-piece "party band extraordinaire”) during the reception. Their first dance was to “This Kind of Love” by Sister Hazel; Molly danced with her father to “I hope you dance”; with her mother to “My Girl”; and was hoisted in the air, along with her hubby, during “Don’t Stop Believing” by Journey.
somehow
Bon Appetito.
tracing the path
1. Tea. I like drinking tea, esspecially mint tea. I never drink fruit teas though. And at the school cafeteria I don't even need to ask for fresh mint anymore, they know I always ask for the fresh mint.
7 created
Description: Peter is going out tonite wearing his “tropical tux” before leaving he tries different paper and cardboard mustaches in front of the mirror.
I hope you keep them coming in the future, as I do struggle to think of names for things :)
Grab the Best Deals on SLR Digital Camera Lenses Online
Remembered if outlived,
Add the tofu and other 1/2 TBSP of coconut oil. Let it cook for a minute, stirring once or twice.
A willingness (in this context) to feel the fear and do it anyway
Once again I rambled on for a long time. Here are my pictures of me in my ball dress that I took yesterday.
Secondly, due to the change of the challenge cut off time an my lack of getting to post the winners in a timely manner (bad, bad, bad me), we will now announce the winners on a Sunday! This will allow me enough time from the cut off to both comment on all of your creations and pick a winner :D
Searchlight Information Services (SIS)
I guess I feel empowered when displaying signs of being humble. For everyone that congratulated me on the yearbook, I have tried to say that the students did the work not me. I just guided.
Well, that’s about it for me. I’m sure the first four things work for some people, but I really don’t see the point or benefit in any of them. As to the last one, well, that should never happen.
(that totally rhymed!)
Now, as seventeen-year-old Princess Alera of Hytanica is besieged from all sides by suitors vying for the Throne, a teenage Cokyrian boy, Narian, is encountered within the walls of her Kingdom, a boy who will show Alera a world where women serve a purpose and not just a husband. As Narian helps Alera find her voice, she struggles against an arranged marriage that will shatter the life she has scarcely begun to live. And when Narian’s shocking past is uncovered, and war with Cokyri looms once more, he must fight to defy a fate ordained at his birth.
the reins abruptly down on the horses’ backs,
1.) What's your favourite flavour?
Hope you have a creative day.
Friday - Whatever allows me to put my feet up after a week alone with my adorable munchkin
Good morning. It’s Thursday, May 3, 2012. Today is “National Lumpy Rug Day.” I swear I’m not making this up. Today is also the birthday of Niccolo Machiavelli. I don’t really know this stuff. I have to look it up.
After letting them dry overnight, I piped on another orange outline on top of the beaks, and then another yellow outline over the rest of the ducks. Then I piped on the outline of the wings, and finally dotted each eye with stiff black icing.
"It's up or down, mate," Dave said, tossing the bottle into his day pack. "One way or the other."
Hello friends, it's been a while! Hope you are doing well and loving life. Here's a few of my favorite songs at the moment, hope you enjoy them! I'm a sucker for anything stripped down or acoustic.
In retrospect 46 years after the above events I consider myself lucky to have been introduced to female sexuality by such a wonderful girl in such a respectful and loving way. I felt even luckier that I found her so many years later to reestablish our friendship on a different level and in a different way. Despite the years and the changes from that friendship we had so many years ago, there was still something special in that memory. Neither one of our spouses knew our secret and still don’t. When we hugged each other 5 years ago for the first time in many many years I know that Sandy and I were thinking of those two wonderful weeks and years that preceded them.
Let go, Let God.
Whilst Bohol’s charms couldn’t entirely shake off the gloom, the island and its history reminded me of the arbitrariness of life in Southeast Asia.
In the case of our children, if we are conveying love in one language, and they feel most loved in another, your love might be getting lost in the translation!
An offensive slogan was being posted on walls before and during the election,” If you want a N***** for a neighbour, vote Labour”. Harold Wilson attributed this to Griffiths on national Television, when asked by Robin Day on Panorama of 9th March 1964 . Mr. Wilson replied, that he understood that this was said by the Conservative candidate in Smethwick. Griffiths denied he or any member of the Conservative party had used this slogan, but did refuse to condemn its use saying it was an expression of frustration felt by local people. He explained that the only person who had heard it was Mr.Walker, who claimed it was in use in the Municipal elections of 1963. A Labour spokesman said that Wilson had said no more than was in the morning’s Times. Mr.Griffiths threatened to sue Mr.Wilson but later declined. After the Election new Prime Minister Wilson broke from his address on the Queens speech to insult Griffiths by calling him a “Parliamentary Leper”, who would be shunned by everyone in the House. This breached the convention that new members be protected until after their Maiden speech! Harold Gurden Birmingham Conservative mp (Selly Oak) told the Times 25/1/1965, “He “had not met Griffiths but would be his friend in the House.” Then on October the 5th 1964 just two weeks before polling Griffiths was denounced for his campaign in the Birmingham Post and the Times Midland correspondent wrote, ”It is abhorrent to all Conservatives candidates and officials of stature to whom I have talked.” The column of October the 12th, “Vile –its all in Black and White.”As the election result was announced on October the 16th Socialists made Nazi salutes. Mr.Walker, the embittered loser griped,” I feel the result tonight will give Smethwick a bad name.” The Bishop of Southwark called the electorate “unchristian” and the Bishop of Chelmsford and Archbishop of Canterbury were critical. Local people supporting a local-born candidate in a democratic election over a local issue is a model of Democracy at work yet, these un-elected Bishops who lived far away, were imposing their a priori ideology on the situation but not drawing inferences from the facts or observation.
Which is true. Cheras has always been my escape, even before when I lived in Damansara. I always end up back home in Cheras. My roots have taken up residence here.
05 I'm Comin' Down
You’ve ditched the Journal of Justice and haven’t written any league judgements for a few months until this latest champion. Your response to threads that asked to return the Journal of Justice was that you’re looking for new ways to present players with a story. Why? Why not keep the journal of justice, and still explore new ways to deliver story?
Today’s the day to see blockages become bridges & obstacles become opportunities. Press in…
Sets: Mixed Bunch, Fabulous Phrases.
Small detailed designs don't work as well.
This is the peace train
Another amber colored beer with a low head, but it tastes like a very good IPA. Excellent quality with the lingering Cascade hops on the aftertaste for 60 seconds. Well done on the strong malt as well. This one reminds me of the Broken Halo but with more citrusy hops. A good workhorse IPA I could see myself picking up all the time, 4 Stars.
The undress or frock uniform of Captains, Commanders, and Lieutenants, to be the same as at present worn by Captains and Commanders, with the addition of the epaulettes and button, which are to be worn the same as in the full dress.
Come back over to my blog tomorrow - Tuesday May 1st, or anytime in the month of May and all the details will be posted here on how to enter and how to get more than one chance to win... I promise it is easey peasey and believe me this software is quite simply AMAZING!!!
More of the same followed as I was asked what toppings I wanted. The rules are more loose here. There are different things you can try, but there are limits. Coleslaw is a fine thing to add, sliced cucumber is just weird. I opted for a bit of red onion and said that was enough. I got a strange look for being satisfied with a sole topping. A few days after eating the sandwich I looked closer at an advertisement.
The 31 year-old, I’ll call her Debbie, told a story about having to go to dinner with a good friend from college so she could meet his fiance. There was a tone of “just another occasion to remind me that I’m still single” to how she told the story. I have definitely been there. I had a serious case of sour grapes when my college roommate got married in 1997. I probably could have lightened up if I had known that I had more than 10 years to still be single myself. I would have been able to pace myself.
Thank you so much for stopping by and reading. I enjoy every visit!
the movement has felt a bit more definite today. maybe if that trend continues over the next few days i'll feel a bit more excited?
You are my candy girl"
Here's a close up of the flower ...
As always thanks for stopping bye, have a great week and I hope you have time to join in the fun at Cooking with Cricut.
Where you were only hit by a shoe lace.
When does the copyright law start to take effect?
My son went to the symphony with his 3rd grade class today. I bought him a blue shirt for the occasion.
‘Witness 82′ – a retired Army Major – was able to tell the Smithwick Tribunal that he did obtain intelligence material following the murders of Chief Superintendent Harry Breen and Superintendent Bob Buchanan in March 1989, but none of the military intelligence source reports (MISRs) has been provided to the inquiry.
Push it in. Push it in further. Push it even further to make sure the little silver ball is jammed in properly. Good.
We crazy humans have a need to feel valued and that we’re important, no matter how thick your skin may be. In my first year of teaching, I have learned that it really doesn’t take much to help make someone’s day. In my classroom, I make it my mission to ensure each of my students recognizes something about themselves that is awesome. It can be done by something as simple as complimenting somebody on their outfit, commending them for something they have done, or just letting them know what they mean to you. To some, this may sound corny, but the effects of positivity are far-reaching. Positivity is infectious. I see it every day. If we were all as apt to give a pat on the back instead of a diss, I think everybody’s day would be just a little bit brighter.
As for Me, I've had only one small contraction today and am feeling great! I've even made time to do some sewing, which is one of my best stress relievers! Little Caleb seems to be growing well. He's continues to be a very active little guy during the day and a good little sleeper at night. I couldn't couldn't ask for more!
Fenugreek seeds powder – 1/4 teaspoon
I am definitely a work in progress – and I will probably always be working toward a new goal. I’m okay with that – because having goals is what keeps me working hard. Not that I believe you should never be happy with yourself – but you should always be finding ways to improve; I don’t believe that work is ever finished.
Today I have a card to share with you for this week's challenge at Tuesday Throwdown, combined with the lovely layout from Mojo Monday. The theme at Tuesday Throwdown is "Clip It On -- use clips of some sort on your project." Our generous sponsor is Sweet 'n Sassy Stamps, and one randomly-selected winner will get to choose some free digis from their store next week. I've used their darling "Thankful Tommy Turtle" digi for my card, coloring the image with Copic markers. To add a little more dimension to the image, I printed a second copy of the flower, colored it, and then cut it out and attached it with foam dimensional tape. To meet the challenge theme, I added a figure-eight-shaped clip that I slid the ribbon through.
And in the shadow of Your wings I will make my refuge,
Step 4... The Roof. The construction of the roof was the most time consuming part of this project. Once the two outer rows were in place, the inner rows could be installed. I used a hearty line of hot glue to adhere each row of cards to the rows next to them. Also note that the rows are not lined up, but skewed just a bit. This is a "Wonderland" project, after all! Don't forget to put down a fun patterned paper on the chipboard before starting to glue down your rows.
Concerns Over Financing Stall Juvenile Justice Reforms in Georgia
But of course, there are people who live their whole lives for the suffering of others. These people are amazing. Mother Teresa, I presume (I don't know much about her). Some people live their entire lives taking care of their sickly parents, or sickly children. They spare no expense on making themselves happy. I really respect these people.
*The Thomas DVD was narrated by Alec Baldwin. This and his Capital One commercials must be punishment from his inability to power down an electronic device on airplanes. No other explanation.
and soaking in a hot tub for the first time in 3 years was ah-mazing.
Perhaps it’s in my blood, passed from father to son, generation to generation, down through the ages. As an island we have been conquered many times and always by sea, by seafaring people like the Vikings. But, if this is the reason, why don’t I get on a ship and spend my free time crossing our oceans and seas? In reality, I have little desire for anything more than an occasional boat trip around our shores, anything further I find boring and judging by the amount of entertainment provided on cruise ships, the majority would agree with me.
Its been awhile since I last posted. A lot has happened.
I really do have all of these lyrics going through my head at various points in my life, and for whatever reason, the wisdom of rock does help. The wisdom of rock. I like that! I haven't mastered these lessons yet, and maybe I never will, but I'm working on it. So to sum it up, in high school I learned nothing worth remembering, but from music, I have learned so many things that are valuable and necessary to live a good life. You need to have the abilities to adapt, to strive, to love, to take things as they come and recognize the times for what they are, and to lighten up every once in a while. How come they don't offer classes like this in high school?
Second, LinkedIn is how 21st century professionals build and manage their network of business associates. The business world is a team sport, where you and your network compete against others. Your network is comprised of people who like, admire, and respect you. They have worked with you in the past, and they are willing to work with you in the future. The foundation of your network is the group of students with whom you study, take classes and enjoy life. You need to formally connect with them before they leave campus.
As far as the pasta goes, I pretty much used the same recipe and method as I used a while back for my butternut squash ravioli, and it worked great. I did use a different flour blend this time. I used Andrea’s flour blend. It works well for anything I have tried it for. Other blends will work fine too. Amy bought me a very nice French rolling pin for Christmas, and it works wonderfully! I was able to roll the dough out thinner this time. (I used an empty wine bottle last time, and it worked ok. The rolling pin worked much better. Although I grew up using the roller style I really like using the tapered type. It is more comfortable for me.)
The next day I took the cake out to get ready to make the caramel sauce. I was very upset about the cracks. Of course, my mom said it was beeeautiful and called me obsessive compulsive. Pot calling the kettle black, eh?
She nodded in acquiescence. The effect of the sake had begun to fuzzy up her brain. Words managed to escape her as she took another scoop. This time she bit into something rubbery. Not sure what it was she swallowed without thinking about it.
The interim resolution of this conflict of ideals is the ideation of a federal SAARC on economic basis, with common market, common currency, common defense and common forums on regional basis for the resolution of interse territorial disputes. Prime Minister Mr. Manmohan Singh’s strategic asseveration that Indian markets shall be opened to SAARC countries, translated into explicable parlance means that domination of the economies of the SAARC countries, by the pre-dominant and ascendant Indian economy that would gradually lead to the exclusion of rival China from South Asia and will corrode the pretentious sovereignty of the SAARC countries.
My pathway led by confusion boats
See, for us, God is bigger than anything else. We leave this pregnancy in God’s hands and will trust in Him. Still, the thought of having triplets is very scary – but at the same time, God will enable us to handle it. While it is still early at almost 7 weeks, we covet your prayers. We ask that you will pray that each of the three will develop fully into healthy babies. We ask that you will pray for my wife as she is going through a lot of morning sickness and will certainly be going through a lot more discomfort than I could ever imagine. We ask that you pray for us as a family as we prepare for this as well. Thank you in advance.
We managed to convince Eduardo Paes to give us his opinions on Eike Batista and the Rio mayor wrote a lovely piece that captures their friendly relationship but most of all, their mutual love for Rio.
We fell in love with what is known as "the Westside". (That would be anything west of the 405.) This included Santa Monica, Venice Beach, Mar Vista and Culver City.
“ValueVision started fiscal 2011 with another quarter of solid progress across our multichannel business, led by strong sales and margin growth and our third consecutive quarter of positive adjusted EBITDA,” ShopNBC CEO Keith Stewart said in a canned statement. “In addition to strong merchandising and operational execution, we also strengthened our capital structure and enhanced our financial flexibility through the early redemption of our 12 percent preferred stock with proceeds from the sale of 9.5 million common shares.”
The debut show tonight will be broadcast from inside the 10 Pound Bar at the Montage Hotel in Beverly Hills, CA.
Thank you Crypton Future Media!
When you are finished blending the reds add white gel pen to the seeds. (I added just a touch of RV10 to the center of the white flowers.)
Who ate a monstrous whale?
I just tried Nutella for the first time last year. What.
*** Update: I just looked up at the mantle and guess what is no longer sitting there? I do believe the card now has a spot of honor in his office!!
This makes about seven standard jars worth of jam.
A bunch of different thoughts ran through my head when my friend did that but I stubbornly clung to the (um) stubborn ones.
Obama quote…..”And I think for us to use that time for some reflection, to give thanks to those who participated, is entirely appropriate, and that’s what’s been taking place.”
playpen. Prince and Bush both make records that are so
What makes the Battle of Britain experience so valuable are the many different facets which put the current experience in context. Firstly, we see established a failure of the "system" to take measures to safeguard the safety and lives of military personnel, and not just any personnel – those who were the key to the whole battle and from which shortage the battle could have been lost.
It's also time to draw the winner of our monthly prize for January sponsored by the loveliness that is Joanna Sheen. Joanna is offering one randomly chosen winner from all of this month's entries a £10 voucher for her online shop. Who will it be..?
Add toppings
P.S. Of course, Grace Dent is still on Twitter. It's like Hotel California - you can check out but you can never leave! You can follow her at @gracedent.
Rolling home brew out to the beer lover community sounds like quite a good idea, if you ask me. Not because the monetary contribution is likely to make any difference nor does the brewing session necessarily open a new world to seasoned craft beer enthusiasts. However, the best beer bottles are tales of a great brewing talent, and sharing a talent tends to improve it. It is time for the best to leave home.
The words are: “Superintendent”, “Rotting”, and “Animate”
Andrew: It was recorded during June 2011 at Peace of Eden Studio’s in the Knysna forest and was mixed back in Cape Town by Matt James at Sound and Motion studio’s.
Arg, LSS Hahaha
A couple of weeks ago LM had the stomach flu and she was nice enough to share with us. So it had been a few weeks since I had been in my sewing room, so I was happily going down to there on Friday morning, when my plans were interrupted by a wet floor.
When I read the first example, my mind tells me I don't need the 'that', so out it comes. But when I read the second example, my mind tells me I do need the 'that', so back it goes. And so forth.
With spring in the air and a new garden blooming on my patio, bright colors and flowers seem to always be on my mind these days. All the fresh air is also bringing out my inner child, who simply cannot wait to play, (hence my rather whimsical post, Hop and Seek). Naturally, the inspiration of spring has found its way to the pages of Wreck This Journal. When I came across a page that instructed me to make handprints or fingerprints, I pulled out my brightest markers and started coloring the tips of my fingers.
tears shed from eyes, love on our face,
"The firefly battery uses a rigid carbon foam to replace the lead grid. It's my understanding that the carbon foam is then pasted with the same sponge lead that all other lead-acid batteries use. The use of a carbon foam current collector apparently adds some capacitance to the negative electrodes and helps reduce sulfation by breaking the paste into smaller morsels, but the gains are of the same magnitude as the gains manufacturers are getting from the addition of carbon to their pastes.
If you have nothing planned for tomorrow, why not go for a country drive and stop at the sale?
250ml Guinness (save the bottle cap for decoration if you like)
Many collectors have turned their attention to Gypsy Queen in the past week or so - either furiously chasing it or disparaging it - so I wanted to take a few minutes to briefly look again at our old friend Heritage
Katherine Jenkins and Mark Ballas did the foxtrot. She's a classical singer from Wales. Her dance was graceful and elegant. Very good. Score: 9, 8, 9 = 26.
Thanks for reading! XOXO
If you're not a follower already, we'd love to have you join in the fun, though it's not a requirement. We're not daily bloggers, but we strive to make sure our content is of the highest quality and that it inspires you!
Hey Ma, I love you!
But guess what? It isn't easy yet. If most of the authors I know are correct, it may never be easy. I feel a bit like I'm wandering in the wilderness and I'm trying to embrace it.
Although I am curious what happened to it, I have already replaced it in my heart with a new plant. I bought this colorful little Haworthia at the NW Flower and Garden show. Since I am not ready to plant outdoors yet, I eased my plant buying soul with a new succulent.
Top 7th: Minnesota
translated from Chinese
Going back to the vision and the song, the urgency of that moment when the Lord would not let me sleep till I emailed Carlos was not merely so he would know immediately. It was rather His way of making us understand of the urgency of the hour for America. The grace period is closing for the great American nation. The words “overdue” and “grace period is long extended” were the last two messages among others, for America, that the Lord gave me in trickles from around 10:30 pm of Feb. 28 till dawn of Feb. 29.
FORMAT/INFO: Demon Squad: Echoes Of The Past is 189 pages long divided over twenty-five chapters. Narration is in the first-person, exclusively via the protagonist Frank “Triggaltheron” Trigg. This is the fourth book in the series and it would not make much sense for new readers to jump into the series with this book.
Take a look!
in this case.
If not in-between like Bridges
Their customers choose the roles they naturally prefer: some of them play healers, others pose as fierce warriors and still others manage and organise their fellow players. These game events, like life, wouldn't succeed without either kind of participant.
I only have one of these to be shared between the two of them. This is has something to do with the fact they hate their expensive swings (more of this later--it is one of the unnecessary to purchase item for me at least). So, this $40 swings proven to be useful, they always happy to sit there for longer period of time and at times either Sanford or Winston will drink their bottles there (they are at the stage where they love holding their own bottles but yet not strong enough to fully hold it, if that makes sense).
Kathleen Britton a Certified Nurse Midwife from Poulsbo, Washington has more than 27 years experience in nursing, midwifery, women's health care and teaching. She is a three-time HOPE volunteer and will be serving as a nurse midwife and HOPE’s Operation’s Officer in Costa Rica and Guatemala.
The reigning in of documentarists takes many forms . . . They are enjoined to be "objective." This is, of course, a nonsensical injunction. Documentarists make endless choices: of topic, people, vistas, angles, lenses, juxtapositions, sounds, words. Each selection is an expression of a point of view, whether conscious or not, acknowledged or not. Any documentary group that claims to be objective is merely asserting a conviction that its choices have a special validity and deserve everyone's acceptance and admiration. Even behind the first step of selection, choice of topic, there is a motive or set of motives.
principle
I rate things that I bake on a scale of 1-4 with 4 being the best and these baked bananas earn 1 rolling pin. My son said a 0, but that isn't on the scale.
The story is not merely an entertainment for his listeners. This story is for Hassan as much as it is for us. Through the telling of it he hopes to step a little closer to understanding what really happened that fateful night. That is his plan and yet so many obstacles stand in his way. He has an ulterior motive but it doesn’t stay secret very long. Only a few pages into the book he reveals:
9. Clouds (Nuages)
Find teaching my boys how to tie their shoes to be more complicated than I originally thought.
else matters; I can't focus on anything but the
5. The Open Mind - Cast a spell (b-side of "Magic Potion", 1969)
convinced and speechless
The 21 statements, Hobgood noted, “are not supported by the facts and have brought the office of the Durham County District Attorney into disrepute.” And Cline’s written assertion that Judge Hudson was “corrupt” was “not only false,” but was “inexcusable” and indicative of “actual malice” in the performance of her duties.
Of course everyone knows about Aztecs and Incas, the Iriquois and the Mayans. But not many of us fully realize just how advanced, and how “civilized” in the European sense, these and many other vanished cultures were.
Have a happy day, wherever you are. I wish you`d ALL send me a postcard!!
1 SF (but not a romance)
Anywho..!
-Party Planning, Tablescapes, and Entertaining Ideas
Skyrim
Empty beaches, empty coffers.
Line of the episode: The Doctor: Which reminds me, there's a girl standing outside in a bikini, can somebody let her in and give her a jumper? Lucy. Lovely girl. Diabetic ...
As a retired marketing/ad agency executive, believe me when I tell you this: The advice and technique Wallace gives in Giving the Bird: The Indie Author's Guide to Twitter will work for virtually ANY small business.
10 So they came and called unto the porter of the city: and they told them, saying, We came to the camp of the Syrians, and, behold, there was no man there, neither voice of man, but horses tied, and asses tied, and the tents as they were.
Hope you all had a blessed Easter! What an amazing spirit-filled time of year!
It seemed as if years had passed and she was stuck frozen like a statue waiting for that glimmer to attack. It never did. To her surprise she had just noticed that part of the wall was damaged from the fighting and a glimmer was coming through. Holding her package to her chest she walked towards the wall.
Love you with all my heart
In contrast, while the critiques at Whale and Star were at times quite brutal in their honesty, they never felt like they were mean-spirited or aimed at defeating the artist. One of the things that came out of my own crit was the sense that my work seemed to be hiding something – an ambivalence about painting itself.
Canadian winters are cold. Vinyl steering wheels often feel like they are carved from arctic ice. They are the last part of the car to warm up. Not to mention your hands are usually already freezing from scraping the windshield. Enter a nice pair of leather gloves. Now, you can spend as much or as little as you want but it *is* possible to get a reasonable pair for around $20. Leather is better than mittens or microfibre because it provides grip on the wheel, making driving safer. Plus (and I speak from experience) the leather will gradually mould to the exact size and shape of your hands, making them super-comfortable.
1. Stuck somewhere in some long line.
The craziness began when I researched upholstery options for daybeds...
We spent the first day of spring having a lovely walk at the arboretum at the Cornell Plantations. We needed to be out for a realtor open house (remember our house is on the market) and most of the kids wanted an outdoor outing. After all, it was the first day of spring and it was unprecedentedly warm! In fact, the arboretum doesn't normally open for vehicle traffic until the end of April. Golf resorts and other outdoor destinations can't argue with the freakishly warm March weather so they just opened up and started the season.
Dan turned to me. “Come on,” he smiled. “We’re alive, right? And I’ve got your shoe.”
Congratulations on your success! You are an award-winning recipient of one of RESOLVE: The National Infertility Association’s (RESOLVE) Hope Awards for Excellence. In the infertility field, this is equivalent to winning the highest seal of approval from your peers. Indeed, this is something to acknowledge, celebrate and promote.
"I'll be honest with you Sierra, Everest needs a Halloween costume too" (this conversation happened on the way to Cubbies, I wish I had taped the whole thing!! Along with this precious comment was Sierra's completely speechless reaction to Miss M's news that she wasn't going to be a princess...as if there is anything else to dress up as...)
When I was a senior in high school, I’d translated an interview with Nin from the French Vogue for a class. It was a fascinating piece and it noted the titles of two books of short stories that had been recently published. I asked for them for Christmas, really having no idea what they were. My mother had a look at them in the local bookshop and demurred. When I discovered them for myself my freshman year in college, I was relieved that she hadn’t bought them for me. Not that it was an act of censorship (my parents were never like that) but it would have been a weird gift to get from your mom.
100g (3 1/2 oz) fine rolled oats
I couldn't keep the nerves from shaking my voice. We were talking. Right? We were talking? "Thanks. That would probably be helpful."
Now all the light we have comes from the Sun and the Moon.
Happy Spring y'all!
A link between Red bull and supercaps is RenaultSport. Renault already uses supercaps as onboard storage for both formula Renault 2.0 and 3.5. In the 2012 FR3.5 series, the KERS only uses Supercaps, not a conventional battery.
“Happy 23rd Birthday to my oldest son Dan Denehy. 23 years ago, in country Grafton NSW, I was blessed with my second child & my first son. A very sick baby developed into a strong, loving, caring young person with a wonderful sense of fun & a love for life; gifted academically, musically, artistically & as an athlete. Dan, I love you more than words & miss you more each day. xxoo”
So here’s some initial thoughts, It’s no surprise that the Green Investment Bank went to Edinburgh, but why can’t Wales have its own Green Investment Bank that’s something the Business Minister Edwina Hart should be asked. On Remploy besides the howls of protest which i share because it’s a false economy to close the factories what can the Welsh Government and Local Authorities doing to help?
Take creatives, for example. I've always been of the mind that if you want it bad enough, you'll prise your way in. You'll work as long or as hard as it takes to make it happen. And that is true. Kind of. It's true for a lot of talented people I know. People work two jobs so they can work on their book, and do the slog that it takes to get an opportunity in a creative department. But as the cost of living rises, especially in London, we have to ask ourselves, is getting into the business within reach for people who don't come from reasonably well-off backgrounds, or who don't have the education to follow the traditional path in?
NYC has declared a weather emergency. The snow is forecast to become more severe this evening and overnight.
“Always the optimist.” She murmured with open affection. Despite their differences, she found that Kenneth was a likeable man–even an attractive one–but it mattered little now.
I'd say this is simply marvelous figure and is still my favorite Marisa fig I've seen yet, which is why I just had to get it.
Someone suggested I might be low in Iodine and it is easy to test and see if this is my case. Online I found several articles about low Iodine, which makes this all even more confusing since there is conflicting information out there. Some of the authors had "Dr." in front of their name, but are they really? Anyway, some say to test for low levels of Iodine I need to paint a patch of Iodine on my upper thigh, belly, or inside the upper arm. If the Iodine fades quickly it means my body is low in Iodine. Several foods were listed that should be eaten to bring levels up and several foods not to eat because they deplete Iodine levels.
Dear Jacqueline, We The Prayer Team, are with you now in thought and spirit. We send you energy and love from our souls to yours and we pray that you will all feel it and know how very loved you are.
On a rough day, I came across this..."O Lord, hear my prayer, listen to my cry for mercy, in your faithfulness and righteousness come to my relief." Psalm 143:1
5. Stolen anything? - Like blog post ideas? As in this one?
May Our God The Almighty prosper Nigeria and Israel and defend us from all our enemies in Jesus Christ Name, Amen!
Pursuant to Rule 33 of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure and Rule 33.3 of the Local Rules of the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York, Plaintiff Julian H. Robertson, Jr. hereby objects and responds to Defendant's First Set of Interrogatories dated April 24, 2006 (the "Interrogatories") as follows:
Oh, and by the way, more than likely, these scenes will not stay in a manuscript. I though it was a great strategy to get past writer's block. Computers are great. You can always delete it later once you've moved on.
In any event, these new "objections" identify what was to me the most frustrating aspect of Judge Berchelmann's work: He didn't actually issue findings on most of the questions asked of him, instead opining at length on other topics. Nobody asked him whether the Texas Defender Service or Judge Keller was more at fault, but that was the main focus of his writing. What's more, "The Special Master exceeded his role by making recommendations as to sanctions, if any." Said examiners:
"You've been what?"
The same way we sprinkle our character’s secret leading up to the great revelation. Some secrets can be told earlier and some later in the story, but by sprinkling them in and drawing your reader to follow, you add tension and anticipation for your readers.
We men – love the color pink (on certain objects only)
They are not in the same order as one would find them on a phone. The 1-3 and 7-9 switch places.
Best admissions office: Franklin & Marshall, roaring fire in the fireplace
Bass, Keyboards - Jah Wobble
This week we have a fantastic sponsor for you
I mean...I really, really, really liked him, but wow! that was pretty fast! :o)
I well remember the chorus of reproof that greeted the news of their budding romance. Most of the hostile reaction was obviously jealousy and sour grapes, but a few sober heads wondered what a couple so disparate in years would have to talk about. My own gut feeling is that conversation plays a minor part in these May-to-December relationships. One thing I learned in my circus days is that nubile young women are prone to flights of fancy. Having grown up watching Star Trek: The Next Generation, Sunny must imagine she is hurtling through space at warp speed whenever Patrick takes her for a spin on his moped. I dare say he repeats all the famous catch phrases to reinforce the illusion of boldly going where no jazz singer has allowed him to go before.
The book Winter’s Bone was optioned for high four figures or low five figures. They researched the Ozarks where they wanted to shoot and put together a photo album to get investors interested. After 25 potential investors passed on a project they got pretty far down the road with one investor before that fell through. Another financer stepped up agreeing to pay half of the budget at which point the descision was made to cut the budget in half and get the film produced.
I'm slowly learning to say those three words faster, easier, to not withhold them from those I love. To be quick to own up to my own failings, whatever they may be, however big or little they were in the scenario. To be the person who steps up and starts the dialogue by taking responsibility for the situation. It's not the easiest way, and requires a degree of vulnerability that I don't think any of us are comfortable with. But it does work. And it kinda makes me think about the way Jesus lived His life-- He said "It's my fault" when it wasn't. And I am so glad He did.
Off to tackle my busiest day of the week. Have a great day and thanks for sharing a bit of yours with me today.
We speculated some more and then I thought of something. "Do you think it shuts down all the garbage mashers in the detention level?"
Food
Girls Secrets Personalized Journal $8.99
Among all the books and blogs and analysis, an epic cornerstone of how to even begin to think of how we got here — David Graeber's Debt: The First 5000 Years.
Christianity, in America at least, has become largely an event for spectators. We show up on Sunday and take it all in then go about our week as usual. But that’s not God’s design.
I've also continued my odyssey into the films of Woody Allen, which I've been watching in chronological order, doling them out over time. In 2008 I caught up with: Manhattan Murder Mystery, Bullets Over Broadway, Don't Drink the Water, Mighty Aphrodite, Everyone Says I Love You, Deconstructing Harry, Celebrity, and Sweet and Lowdown. This leaves me right on the brink of Woody's most critically maligned period, so 2009 will find me watching some of a favorite director's least-loved films. I'm curious to see what I'll think of this period of his career, since I've found that thus far I tend to find something of worth even in those Woody Allen films that no one else seems to care for.
Of the many perils I have had,
I'm always one to plan things, to have hopes and dreams of things to do or be, and I can't do that anymore. I feel like I've lost myself. I hope things somehow get better, but I'm not sure they will. I've tried to keep a positive attitude, and somehow I've lost it. If someone finds it, kindly send it back my way...
I have my final lesson plan here. It includes explorations of all kinds of living environments all over the world and presentations with slide shows of beautiful pictures and videos of those living environments. Students can learn about both the physical features and cute animals of those amazing natural world. I hope you enjoy the journey in the nature!
Days I did my morning pages: 5/7
Today, Paul's dad and stepmom and sister were in town for an appt. We were able to all meet them for lunch at TGIFridays. Yum! Haven't been there in a long time. Even Paul was able to take an early lunch and meet us up there :)
FG: Thank you for asking. Yes, I was just in a great little ABC TV movie with John Corbett, A Smile As Big As The Moon. It is a great family film and it will touch your heart. It is re-running currently on The Hallmark Channel. I also have a faith-based baseball story, Hero, making the festival rounds right now and should be out soon, and a couple of indie films due out later this year, A Box For Rob and Deadly Renovations. My production company, Follow Your Dreams Productions, is also co-producing a film about NASCAR legend Junior Johnson and we currently have Ian Jeffers (who wrote The Grey) working on a draft of the script. This project has been six years of my life so far, so let me say this in closing: when you go see a movie in the theater, and then it airs on TV and comes out on DVD like Gods and Generals, I have learned that it is sure close to a miracle happening. Someone writes a script, then pitches it to a producer, who then has to pitch it to investors and the studios, who then has to schedule it and cast it, then pick locations and crew for it, try to take what is written on the page and the vision that the director has in his head and make a film out of it, that the public will actually pay hard earned dollars to go see it, I swear it is a miracle…remember that next time you watch a movie!
and we are super excited to be supporting
Duplicitous actions, accusations of some that others are behaving in a deceitful manner persist through the twentieth century through World Wars I and II, especially during the “Cold War” with USSR. Now in the twenty-first century relations with North Korea, China and Pakistan, to name a few countries, have elicited similar concerns about nations behaviors.
Because children, however, especially black and brown poor children, are plagued by circumstances beyond their control, Marian Wright Edelman, President of the Children’s Defense Fund, began the Freedom Schools movement. It is, simply, an amazing program, which takes children at risk and makes them know that they can do anything they want – beginning with reading – and moving on. The program is run by the national CDF staff, but the classes in these schools are taught by college-aged kids many of whom learn, quite by accident, that they have a passion for reaching kids whom society has all but thrown away.
I don't know where to even begin on all the work I have to do and instead of making me want to tackle everything, it makes me just want to sleep in the hopes that it'll all disappear when I wake up. In fact, I'd probably still be sleeping right now, if it wasn't for my friend, Eric. Last night, I mentioned to him that I was out of milk and hadn't even had time to stop at the store for more, and the most tragic part about it was that I couldn't have any coffee today because I can't drink it without cream or milk or something. Ew.
Runner Up: Anchors new one is nice
In response to the increase in religious comments surrounding the budget/deficit debate, the Faithful Budget campaign released the following statement: “As communities of faith we have long believed that the budget is a moral document and we judge each proposal not by the arbitrary fiscal support it provides, but rather by the
But if I had the answer
And then there is Knight’s Tower, rising 45 metres above the forest floor, this spiral tower offers gorgeous views of the Illawarra. “Sucking it up” and making myself climb the stairs of the tower, all the while, panicking about how I was going to get down again, I DID take a quick look at the view and then proceeded to have a slight panic attack and had to head back down quickly.
I am feeling really good. Tired, yes, more and more so, and the aches and pains of later pregnancy are making themselves at home. But all in all – especially in light of how sure I was in the beginning that there was no way this could go well – I feel really good. Way better than it seems I should be feeling for a chick in her mid-forties pregnant for the sixth time. I, honestly, am incredibly grateful that I am feeling well and that this has been a smooth, uneventful pregnancy.
And I was doing a happy dance all over the place, well specifically I did a happy dance straight to the bathroom, apparently cabbage could not hold back it's excitement either!
The story was nice enough and maybe at that point things would have finally started happening and Charlie would have finally grown a personality, but I was so mired in a a sludge of meh that I could not force myself to find out.
I tied them onto the curtain rail hooks so I can move them carefully along the rail for different effects - they look very cool all bunched together - but you could secure them to a rail or piece of string, or use pins or blutack to keep them in place in your window. A few strands hung together would also make a fantastic mobile!
In my mind, the scientific confirmation of a beginning trumps all the philosophical arguments in the world. If we had evidence that the universe has no beginning, Christians like William Lane Craig (WLC) would not give up Christianity. They'd just find a new argument for why a lack of a beginning is consistent with Christianity. The only reason WLC can't think of an argument now is that he doesn't have the motivation.
This is the product they were selling !
The colors are beautiful in purples and greens and the yarn is a dream to work with, but, don't you know this was the hardest design I had faced yet! I wanted to show off the colors while designing something based around earth but anything resembling rocks or tree roots was just not working for me. Then I became inspired by my back yard.
At 9:00am I called them. I was told that the repair guy, Tim, was loading his truck now. I said, “Really? Just now? You guys said between 8 and 9. You said I’d be the first stop and just now he’s getting ready? What’s he been doing since 8?” Naturally that got a “Uhhh, well, we had some scheduling issues. hold on.” Suddenly Tim on the line. He said he’d be over in a half hour. I told him that wouldn’t work as then I’d be severely late. He said he’d come after my work. He agreed on about 5:45. As of 6:51 he never showed up yet again. Adams Homes and Haskell’s Hardware sucks.
My friend Chantal's son Zavier is a very talented young artist and at the age of eight, loves to paint and draw. Chantal asked me to make a cake inspired by one of his creations.
Um......back to paths..... one of these frames..
cardamom powder 11/2tsp
Additionally, the nurse should inquire as to whether or not she will be allowed to select her own attorney. Many insurance companies have contracts with certain law firms to provide legal services on their cases for a reduced fee. The insurance company may require you to use one of its own contracted attorneys, or even one of its in-house attorneys which it employs directly. Given the limited number of attorneys with experience at handling nursing law issues and trying malpractice cases, the nurse should attempt to obtain coverage through a company which allows her to choose her own attorney.
Last week I shared news about Take Part.org’s children’s story contest, in conjunction with the release of the movie, The Help. This week they have a new contest for short nonfiction. First prize winner gets a trip to New York to see a live performance of The MOTH Storytellers. Submit your 400-word interview with an inspiring person you know. Get all the details here. Deadline for entries is September 5.
If they had written their stories,
Sicily is well-known for a bunch of clichés as Mediterranean feeling, & palms, mafia & the Godfather, honor killing & vendetta, Mongibello & Stromboli with fire and ash. Our philosophy of the southern tip of Italy is pathetic. But here are some ruffians who want to change it. They mess with Swedish Death Metal and add her part to globalization of Metal. Let´s see, if it works, welcome UNDEAD CREEP!
1.) I ran all three run days for 2 miles. Yeehaw! Week 7 is in the books. I'll be starting week 8 on Monday which is a 28 min run. My new shoes did give me blisters so I won't be wearing them again until my blisters are healed up. Then I'll make sure I have taller socks on when I do wear the new sneaks again.
6) A female character who has the wrong flaws
Update (3:40 PM): In comments, a reader asked why I did not go to the media. My response:
I do still agree with Mona to a great extent, I do believe that there is a problem here in the ME (also partly here in Israel), but I’m not sure I would blame the religion (Islam), but rather how people are expressing it, maybe there is the problem found.
“It should never be a crime to be gay” Mrs Clinton said at the United Nations in Geneva, adding that a country’s cultural or religious traditions was no excuse for discrimination.
Occasionally it still very much surprises me that I am here. Because I don't do things like this. I stay within a five mile radius of where I was born. I cling to security. And then I didn't. Unsurprisingly, or perhaps surprisingly, life feels pretty much the same here as it did in London, despite the shifting of tectonic plates.
Duck-Rabbit Wee Heavy Scotch Ale
Music makes films. Sure, don’t get me wrong, the old silent films have a lot going for them; but even they normally had musical accompaniment. There’s just something so primitive, so primeval, about telling a story to a rhythm, as if it harkens back to the days of travelling minstrels & story-sellers, who would roam between villages, often with an instrument of sorts (like a lute, etc), telling tales & swapping stories for trade. Even further, to great stone circles, drums made of animal skin, fires crackling, and the recounting of the days kills, the frenetic war-drum to punctuate the story’s more bloodier episodes. . . .
Look for products that are labeled specifically for use with sensitive skin and avoid fragrances in your cosmetic products. Non-allergenic is another phrase to look for on the labels. The key is to avoid anything with high dye levels or preservatives.
WordPress.com
In spite of his sorrow and suffering, he commands his soul to have hope in God. He knows more of God is the only hope for him. He is sure God is the only One able to provide him with the nourishment he needs for his spiritual and physical health to be restored. He promises to continue praising God—now, and in the future—as the One who will transform his circumstances.
Strong was vociferously opposed to the consolidation, thinking it a ridiculous burden to the city coffers, vetoing it even up to the very end. By that time, however, Strong was not seeking re-election, but for decidedly personal reasons. In cleaning up the city -- getting it ready for the future -- his own business had nearly gone bankrupt. He would die just two years later, in 1900.
Date night, date day….it has been on my mind lately.
‘Low’ reserves
There is a universal aspect to Psalm 22: all the earth will bow down because the Lord has dominion over the whole earth. The whole earth will feast and worship the Lord in Zion. As in Isaiah 25:6-8, both Israel and the nations will stream to Mount Zion to worship God. When the Lord prepares the banquet, he will remove the disgrace from his people and defeat the final enemy (Death itself). But in Isaiah 25:6-8 there is some ambiguity since the nations do come to Zion, but it is unclear that they will be worshipers or if they will face judgments. Most English translations highlight only the universalism of the text based on Christian assumptions. Jewish interpreters regularly took the banquet in Zion as time of judgment on the nations rather than universal salvation.
I was suckered again. All the clearing up to do and he was beetling off. I never learn.
Sometimes when you take a picture you like to plan everything out and know exactly what the shot will be. Then other times you merely are an observer in this wonderful word waiting to catch a glimpse of something great. In the case of this rather weathered staircase in southwest Ohio it’s a bit of both worlds.
Step 4: The moment you have been waiting for; it’s time to collect your prize! Click on over to the prizes tab and you’ll be able to locate the $10 Runescape card easily. Furthermore, most the time you get the code instantly! It’s very unlikely for them to run out of stock of game cards as they stock a lot of them.
I picked Samantha up during snack time at daycare. They packed up some turkey and apple slices for the road for me.
I have new-found appreciation and love for doors. Weird, I know. But the right door can make such a difference, of which I was reminded last week when new doors were installed at the house. (yay!)
The ingenious team behind the company is Pamela Liou and Zon Chu. Pamela is writer and filmmaker while Zon comes from a forensic science and business background. No wonder.
Sydney Taylor Honor Award Winners for Teen Readers:
I eventually realized that I was doing okay, and that my much needed rest was well deserved. I started running more, began a meditation practice, nixed some of the toxic habits and people in my life and started doing what really matters the most to me. (And if anyone is truly interested, what matters the most to me involves really hot baths accompanied by good books, red wine, and bad singing. It also involves going to bed way earlier than what is deemed as hip or exciting.)
Look over the lychee fruits carefully to make sure that all traces of the pits and tough shells have been discarded. Puree the lychee fruits with 3/4 of the custard in a food processor fitted with the steel blade or in a blender. Stir the puree back into the saucepan.
You know it's true, oh
I was getting a bit “bummed” about how long this is taking me and how little progress I’d made last week despite trying to be dogged about working at it. This week, thanks mainly to being forced to take the bus a few times, I’ve managed to get closer to my target yardage (40m/day) over the past week. Boy, am I glad!
“Perhaps, perhaps not; plenty of space to sleep though, I promise.” Naida spoke casually and freely.
EDDIE ROSS: Lifestyle Expert
Mr. Riggs’s book, and indeed his paranormal investigations, were inspired initially by strange lights and energies found in the Big Thicket, that have been seen since the earliest days of white settlement in that area. Riggs has encountered these anomalies in other parts of the world, and he has concluded that they form the first act, as it were, of a sequence of strange phenomena. An understanding of them is fundamental to understanding Riggs’s work and findings.
Rook realized what was happening too late and she was suddenly surrounded by burly miners with massive hands and empty expressions.
Not long after I wrote about that paper dress (pictured in the photo above), I received an email from the designer's son asking for a copy of the photo for his mom. Well long story short, I ended up doing an oral history interview with the designer, Ruth Dukas, for the ROM archives. As it turns out, Ruth only made one paper dress in her career, but was in fact renowned for the exquisite embroidery and beading of her evening gowns and cocktail dresses.
Cook pancakes on a griddle at 375 degrees F. When bubbles start forming, flip and cook on the other side.
Well on one of these bathroom trips, as my dear husband was unhooking me. At 10:30pm,all hell broke loose. I was getting ready to wheel my way to the bathroom. When a big splash happened. And let me tell you that was like the movies. I stood there in complete awe as about 1 gallon of water flew out onto the floor...nice...ugh... And I said OH NO. And Josh was like what. And I said UM MY WATER BROKE, LOOK ITS ALL ON THE FLOOR call a nurse... So he pressed the button and the nurse came in.
Only, I spent the whole night worried and pissed that I was worried. I can’t seem to focus right now and I want to cry. I want to call him back and tell him that , no sorry, I know this is rough and so never mind just come home. I won’t. But the want, the desire is there. Now, why?
“X” – Can you pick up some eggs on the way home from work?
Master suite, Beautiful free standing Kohler tub and his and hers vanities opposite each other in the space. I think the use of the textural wood on floor, ceiling and walls is outstanding.
How to cope with this stress? How do you control it and not let it consume you?
But I do doubt this dinner. God give me the last ounce of courage to confront my suspicious cookery!
SCHLESSINGER: They did, and I'll say it again --
As RW said, it’s not weakness to want to love and be loved. But it’s the stuff of romance novels and love songs to think that someone else can complete you. It’s fantasy. In reality, a person who feels incomplete is hurting and will have difficulties having a deep and truly intimate and satisfying relationship with another.
Staff Training
It has been a few days since my last post. I have been busy coming up with new product ideas. I decided that now is the time to offer a GIVEAWAY. The winner will receive 40% discount on any piece of art in my shop or a custom made piece. Shipping is free. You can get a piece like this one in the size and color of your choice. Visit my shop to see the rest of my work.
The Polish software has enough structural integrity (I’m sorry if that makes you think of engineering) to allow for progress. Again, I would probably dry up after a question or two in a Polish conversation, but I am seeing improvements in my ability to translate verbal Polish into written, as well as some phrases and grammatical foundations starting to sink in.
During the battle Jonah accidentally hits a tree and the handle on his tomahawk breaks. Noh-Tante holds Jonah down and gloats that he had weakened the handle so that it would break. Jonah, about to die, grabs the knife he keeps in the collar of his coat & stabs Noh-Tante. Jonah has broken Apache law by using a weapon other than the tomahawk and he must pay a price. The chief explains that Jonah had saved his life once but then killed his son, so the world must know that Jonah is half good & half evil. They tie Jonah between two poles and press a heated tomahawk into the right side of his face. He is kicked out of the camp & told that he will be killed if he ever returns.
It is almost the end of Week 4 and looking back, i thank God for his providence. Without him, i wonder how i ever did survive it? On the scrapping side, i have been slow but productive. I completed quite a number of things but have been too lazy to upload. So forgive me for the lack of update. I do hope to regain my blogging momenturm.
In addition, the flowers on the dogwood trees have four leaves in the shape of a cross. Each leaf edge on a dogwood flower is tinged (usually in either brown or red) and the legend claims that it is a symbolic reference to the blood of Jesus.
And he moved the second string from his harp crying out and saying: Listen, O daughter, consider and incline your ear; forget your own people also, and your father’s house (Ps. 45:10).
Pete was the tidy and neat one
The President, after analyzing the situation from intelligence reports, input from his military commanders, the views of his cabinet members, and perhaps other appropriate staff made a decision based on the overall risk assessment. He gathered as much information and as many educated opinions from those he places his trust in as he could. Precisely what a effective executive does in business.
and then a few folks picked up on that theme
America! America!
But I am committed to posting on a semi-regular basis.
Wiseguys are also good customers — though they prefer the duo’s more opulent Del Posto on Tenth Avenue. They’re interested in the food. And they make friends with the staff: “There’s one group that’ll come in with the roll of hundies — a hundred to the coat-check girl, a hundred to every hostess, a hundred for the maitre d’, a hundred to the bartender, a hundred to the barback, a hundred to the piano player, and suddenly our piano player, Fat Tony Monte, turns on a dime and puts the brakes on the Sondheim mid-f--king measure and starts twirling tarantellas like he was working Don Corleone’s wedding reception.”
Curly kale (or any dark green cabbage like Savoy or Cavolo Nero)
What about the exchange-value of this new property, is it also collectively owned? The film does not explicitly address the ownership of the artworks created by the associated producers once they get commodified. It is probably fair to assume that the originator and leader of the project, Vic Muniz, holds the copyrights. But he certainly incorporates his fellow artistic workers in a profit-sharing scheme. Over all, the political economy of the project is tending towards socialism if not there yet. It's one hell of an excellent social democratic cooperative.
Have a great day all!
In Blogland, the world is filled with colourful flowers, but my garden resists them. All except two tulip bulbs, which have sprouted up merrily from the same pot that houses my inexplicably dying blueberry bush. I can't tell you why they did this. I didn't put them there. These tulips are even more interesting because the gazillions of tulips that I did plant a couple of years ago in a border nearby have never even bothered coming up.
broke out and he was being sent
The meat just never took that fall-apart tender texture and rich taste that a good chuck roast would. It was tough and a bit gristly.
My photog was out of town and I was just too lazy to figure out how to use our new tripod.
A once in a lifetime opportunity to purchase a private island that has it all endless possibilities to enhance it to you personal taste.
I could not sleep that night, I was happy, scared – a mixture of emotions. Next morning I wanted to shout out to the whole world, I have found him!! The man that I had been waiting for my whole life. I have found him!!!
Yes, yes. But as I've just explained, they're not going to do that because (a) they would not benefit from it; au contraire, they would be damaged by it, and (b) if they wanted to stop actors being, ahem, "poisoned by secondhand smoke at BBC studios", they would do so voluntarily. I know, Stan, that you struggle to comprehend the difference between public and private action, but not everything in life needs to be dealt with through repressive legislation.
Therefore, although missing an endorsement (obvious when read a third time), the point and theme were constant – Romney is ok, he’s going to best Obama and we are going to help him accomplish this task – and put our fiscal house in order. In adding to that, one might also consider our national “emotional house” which is in dire straits, and needs a boost. Romney may not be the most charismatic politician, nor the most seasoned, but he does exude confidence, and a careful approach to issues that is to be respected, not ridiculed, and therefore, will make a fine leader – not a bit like Bush (as the Campaign and the media attempt to make that comparison), rather a lot like Romney. This blogger is more than comfortable with Romney as the GOP candidate and the clear alternative to President Obama and the policies of the current administration.
* Brow chakra – forehead pains and pressures
My first foray into true epic fantasy & Sci-fi was the movie "Star Wars", I distinctly remember being allowed to stay up past my bed time, when I was about 5 or 6, to watch it on TV, every time it came on.
Refreshed and happy, we boarded our 9:40pm flight home last night hoping LLC would conk right out. Hope springs eternal. Conk out? She freaked out! Overtired, she did not want to be strapped onto Chris or my lap for takeoff. (This highlighted to me that although she will be under 2 next time we fly to NY, we will really need to get LLC her own seat). We fortunately had an empty seat in between us she that she could claim once cruising, but oh, to get to that point. She went mental. Crying, gasping, gagging, flailing, gouging, arching. Forget the snacks and toys. She was past the point of no return. A “well meaning” flight attendant, who I’m sure didn’t have children, asked "didn’t have any toys to share with her?" Had she not noticed the book or teddy that just flew through the air when proffered?
RVOKD Blog (rvokdblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
He also thanked the members of the International Contact Group and the Third Party Facilitator for their constructive role in the conduct of the talks.
Thousands of people joined a Twitter drive to support the Leadership Conference, which represents more than 80 percent of American nuns. Using the hashtag #whatsistersmeantome, one person wrote of the nun who “was the rock of our Catholic campus.” Another man tweeted about how his father lost his own mother at 13. “It was the Mercy sisters who consoled and loved him onward.”
Of course we will have chocolate bunnies and Easter baskets. The kids are growing real grass for their baskets. There will be an Easter Egg hunt and we will be baking Madeline's, a favorite cookie any time of the year. We will hold this time of renewal and new life sacred. Starting on Easter Sunday we will be closed for two weeks. It will be a time of renewal for me. It will be a time to purchase and get all the things we need for the wonderful summer program.
Or nearly so, but whatever.
Isn't it beautiful?
I thank you all for your good wishes and you were right - things do happen for a reason. I was not remotely happy with our flat and I know we will be happy in our new one. I have to say my spirits are considerably lifted. So lifted I'm ready to go after our landlord for our money with guns loaded and swords drawn.
Peter Murphy
The saguaro boot nests have been added to my collection of bird nest, eggs, rocks, and drift wood in a container placed in my greenhouse.
‘Ollie! That’s ridiculous!’ Ollie thought his mother looked hacked off. Wearing black camouflage gear and bristling with all those spacey looking weapons, he thought she looked hacked off and dangerous. Ollie decided to shut up; and mimed zipping his mouth closed.
It would seem that our NEXRAD’s double as microwave heaters, and ATMOSPHERIC mirror generators… per the findings listed above.. the MHz and GHz capabilities do indeed match.
Elise
All in all, I was really pleased with this 10 performance, even if it did make me want to sleep all afternoon. I still am no fan of the distance, but it’s not quite the nemesis I had made it out to be.
Many of my happiest childhood memories revolve around the Monkees, their music, and their wonderfully campy tv show, so I was deeply saddened to hear about the passing of Davy Jones earlier today. I'll admit that he wasn't my favorite Monkee ( I was more of a Peter/Mike girl), but I couldn't help but adore him for his musical talent, his adorable British accent, and that impish gleam in his eyes.
People seem to be surprised when I say I don’t like children. I have a daughter, how can I not like children? The answer is simple. I love child, singular, I hate children. I love my child with all my heart; I just hate other people’s kids.
"Mater is currently ensconced within the confinement of an establishment built to nurse those that are most vulnerable to matters of the cranium and that which causes untold cognitive shifts in patterns, by fault of the deep Limbic system".
6 Tbs sugar
Buds bursting open, leaves unfurling and flowers opening to the sky:
But enough about me. How was the beer? A wonderfully sour but balanced combination of cherries, malt, oak tannins, and bourbon. I highly recommend getting down to there to try this treat!
By allowing the information and energy of events to flow through you without attaching judgment and labels to it will prevent it from becoming “stuck” in your energy field. What happens when we make a judgment on an event is this:
Beastie Boys fan, anyone?
i'm thinking of you all. and wishing you good things in the future. in whatever form that takes.
* with garden and gazebo
Coming back to our basic thought, “Why was Paul commanded to go and the twelve allowed or rather commanded to remain?” Israel failed to receive the Spirit filled ministry of the twelve apostles. Earlier in Matthew 10:5, Jesus said to them, “Go not into the way of the Gentiles.” Later, in Luke 24:47, they were commanded to go “among all nations, beginning at Jerusalem.” If the Jews would receive their ministry and become a nation of priests they could “go into all the world and preach the gospel to every creature.” (Mark 16:15)
Michiganers started an initiative petition to get the law put to a vote of the people. The initiative petition board in Michigan (with two each Republicans and Democrats) deadlocked 2-2 when trying to decide that a challenge to the anti-overseer petition was valid – the font size of the petition was too small. The challenge to the petition was brought by a Republican group that shares office space and phone number with a Republican consulting firm, of which one of the two Republicans on the Michigan election board is a principle. So that Republican member is attached to both the challenge to the petition, and also gets to vote on the validity of the challenge. That member didn’t see (or more likely, ignored) the blatent conflict of interest, and he voted to sustain the petition, which has so far worked to leave the overseer law in place.
Restraining the Top:
As I was driving on the Dames Point bridge, I think of what I need to say,
I heard God’s voice last Thursday and that was enough to make me fall on my face. I saw the cross this Thursday and that was enough to break my heart. God’s sorrow is the greatest. He was scorned by the ones He came to save. And He still is.Don’t add to His grief. Change. I beg you.
A long running RPG series, the SaGa games were first introduced on American shores on the Game Boy in the form of the Final Fantasy Legend series. SaGa Frontier marked the first time the franchise was released outside of Japan under it's original SaGa name. Kenji Ito is to the Saga games what Nobuo Uematsu is to the Final Fantasy games. The man has struck gold since day and one and his work on the Saga titles (a series that can be quite difficult) has been masterful across all platforms. Baccarat makes you feel like you're in a huge city at night with bright lights all around. Or at a casino, rolling the dice hoping you'll get lucky. I've never been to Las Vegas but I firmly believe this tune should be that city's anthem.
I wanted it to be true.
Limbaugh calling a student a slut and
Come now, My children, into a perfect truth, a present truth of that which I am doing. For, in the days that are before you that lead from this point until the time that you call The Feasts of Tabernacles, there will be an outflow, overflow, an infusion of My Spirit in such magnitude that it will elevate you in the kingdom of the Most Holy, to a place where your feet will be like hinds feet in high places.
To some degree, critics are correct when they say that she is under scrutiny like no candidate in a long, long time. But they are incorrect when they suggest sexism. If this was a good-looking and rugged candidate named Sam Palin acting and saying the exact same things, the scrutiny would be also be the same. (To that end, if she was plain-looking, male or female, nothing would change.) It has nothing to do with her gender or appearance, although those become convenient excuses. This country has become collectively tired and even angry at the social conservatives driving every agenda in this country. Even many Republicans are finally understanding that part of the reason that the party has left its fiscally responsible roots is because fiscal policy no longer drives the GOP: it’s repealing Roe v. Wade; it’s electing “conservative” judges (also strictly a Roe v. Wade issue); it’s “good Christian values”; it’s cleaning up the airwaves; it’s protecting marriage from gays.
Most importantly, it has to be about more than selling books—or whatever your goal might be. It has to be about what you stand for, and who you are.
Level 10: MP Cost: 40, Duration: 100 seconds, 55% chance to not get knocked back.
Although The Slits' attitude was clearly a crucial ancestor for Riot Grrrl and its UK chapter (Huggy Bear et al), the question of their musical legacy is more elusive. 1979-81 post-punk experimentalism – death-disco, agit-funk, ‘John Peel bands’ – is one of the great neglected eras of modem music.
I turned my computer on and noticed that the mouse wasn’t working. The trackpad worked and I watched the arrow move all around the screen. I clicked on mozilla firefox and it didn’t open. I clicked on microsoft word and it didn’t open. I clicked on a folder labeled ‘gchat’ on my desktop and nothing happened. Nothing was happening. I was stressing out.
“People find out you commute by bike, and they think of a tree-hugging, granola-crunching, carbon-offsetting hippie,” Moyle says over coffee at My Dog Joe.
Of course, when they give you the impression that you are their only hope when they ask you to do more stuff for them or give them more money, it’s easy to think that you need to keep covering their butt.
Warner recording artists, The Art of Dying, has officially hit the road for its Summer tour. the band will be playing alongside the likes of: Shinedown, Buckerry, Chevelle and a number of others. The band’s SUmmer tour will take it throughout the southeast, midwest and east coast between May and July. The band will be in Huntsville, AL tonight at the Von Braun Center alongside Chevelle. Fans in North Carolina looking for a reason to getaway this weekend can see The Art of Dying live in Virginia Beach at the WNOR Lunatic Luau Friday night.
1/4 cup superfine sugar for topping.
Well, next one will steer things up more and more!
The little pig is from Cricut's Create a Critter cartridge. The papers are from the Bella Blvd. Spring Flings and Easter Things collection. The flags were created using MFT Dienamics and stamps, and of course, we have some Twinery Twine!
My friends, although they think I am right to move on, think I should still be hopeful. One said its not black and white. If I do hear from him, I should meet up with him and see where it goes. Maybe he is overwhelmed with the move (I would be), maybe he met someone else, but in the end, he owes nothing to me. At most, maybe some courtesy to tell me after these weeks of him saying how much he wanted to see me, that he no longer did. But that is still a gray area. Maybe I will hear from him while he’s in town later this week. Maybe I’ll hear from him again when he moves here permanently. Like my friend said, its not black and white.
I was thinking about the end of the year and I thought it would be cool to do a Rock Star themed end of the year unit! Initially I was thinking of a Space theme, but them I realized Rachelle from What the Teacher Wants beat me to the punch! =)
Paper: 'Report Card' by October Afternoon.
So through the woods and over fields
Conservation, this in the 1970s, impels Schaller to help jumpstart the founding of a national park in the Hunza region, which he tries to downplay but which represents his practical command of insight and organization (he shows as in his ascent to Shey later on a fierce determination) to win his cause. While the ungenerous area depresses him, he manages to make it better when he leaves it. This journey is full of such ups and downs, and it's a level-headed report of the sightings he makes as much as a chronicle of his meetings and adventures. Many cold nights in sleeping bags attest to his endurance.
It wouldn't be accurate to say I'm self-taught. I was taught by people who were already dead when I found them: Andrew Loomis, Norman Rockwell, Harold Speed, Solomon Solomon, and Howard Pyle. Fortunately their words have come down to us through the printed page. As an art student, I read those books as if my life depended on them. I cherished all their words, but I couldn't hear their voices.
of our souls
That being said, the juniors who were trying very hard and still struggling are not at fault. Perhaps they just need some directions, which would differ from one to one. I’d just wish that the new measures and system I proposed together with the new management would go through, and provide a better foundation for future newcomers.
Fill the tartlets with one teaspoon of nutella, add a slice or two of banana and sprinkle with the chopped nuts.
What made this study different from other research done on DVR usage was that it measured actual behavior, not self-reported behavior. As you know, self-reported behavior is highly suspect and almost always turns out be inaccurate.
He pushed his Clearsight ahead in time again, searching for the direction that would keep him out of the Wilder's crushing grasp. In his previous Clearviewing, the thing had picked Rissad up as if he weighed nothing at all, but Rissad was no Clearseer. The creature in front of Rel would have weaknesses like any other of its kind.
I sat there in his office, while he projected images in my eyes and examined my cornea…or whatever, I don’t know what he was doing, but the little house on the prairie kept appearing and disappearing. It was really annoying, but that was the point. He noticed my torso stretched uncomfortably, so he lowered the table. I said, “Thank you.”
Check out the video for addionational information if you must wish to know more...
“I don’t know how she cooked up the story. I do have a CCTV footage showing Wang and Duan having a fight in the shop on the same day when Wang threatened to jump off the bridge. I was having a meeting in Tanjung Tokong at that time.”
People watch, read the newspaper, and hang out for hours with a cafe mocha or two. The close-set tables make it the perfect atmosphere for holding hands, while the busy setting is sure to give you plenty to talk about.
HM Treasury have recently announced a further consultation on the plan to introduce a *patent box* to allow companies taxed in the UK to reduce their corporation tax liability to 10% on profits arising from patent exploitation. When first announced this was only going to affect licence income for new patents and I suspect most of the patent profession ignored it as yet another empty political gesture - which it was.
‘The Lady Elizabeth’ by Alison Weir
(1) I came to a deeper understanding of the importance of gratitude. I am really starting to see that it is our attitude about our circumstances much more than our circumstances themselves that determines our happiness. We hear this so much that it might seem trite, but it's so profound and so true. In many ways, my 2010 and 2011 were mirror images of each other. I was home with a baby on maternity leave for the first half of 2010 and worked the second half, and then I worked the first half of 2011 and was home on maternity leave the second half. There were a lot of similarities in the years. A lot of the things that were challenges in 2010 were still challenges in 2011. But 2010 was a much harder year for me. And I think a lot of that was because when I was having a hard time in 2010, I started working on my attitude and focusing on the good, appreciating what I had, and living in the present, instead of focusing on what I didn't have and worrying about the future. That shift made 2011 a really happy year.
To be fair, not everyone who asks is taken aback/turned off by my answer. Some people, you can genuinely tell, just don’t care. Or, alternately, they do care, but not in the wondering how many of my brothers and/or cousins are responsible for global Islamist terrorism kind of way.
A. An experienced midwife who is committed to working with each woman, protecting promoting and supporting healthy physiologically normal processes in pregnancy and childbirth.
2.) American Vision - Gary DeMar and company are making much of YouTube as well providing some great articles on a wide assortment of topics. Not afraid to take on the hard issues.
Momofuku Ssäm Bar
I sometimes forget that she is a baby. She had to grow up so fast because of Kaelin coming along. She is a baby but my baby talks in full sentences and knows her full alphabet and can count to 20 and loves to draw circles and has a wild imagination and is such a big sister that I completely forget that she is still so young.
This Fiesta gas grill is spacious enough to meet your grilling needs. It is suitable for preparing a meal for up to four people. With this grill, you will enjoy cooking your favorite meals outdoors.
Therefore, we in the World Association of Muslim Scholars protested against him, and demanded that he apologize to the nation of Islam for his affronts. Everybody makes mistakes. He had an opportunity to say: I didn’t mean it, I did not mean to affront the Muslims, it was a slip of the tongue, or something like that. But he did not do so. Therefore, the World Association of Muslim Scholars has decided to freeze its relations with the Pope and the Vatican, until he apologizes or says something that will cover or erase this. This has yet to happen. Therefore, we expected the Jordanian officials to say to him: Before you come here, we want you to say something to rectify your relations with the Muslims.
Norbie is apparently Al's only human friend. They go back several years to their army days. Norbie saved Al from drowning after their ship was bombed in the Pacific. Al owes a lot to Norbie. And when he comes with suitcases in hand and a hard luck story of a failed marriage and failing health Al can't turn him out. Norbie becomes his roommate for an indeterminate stay. One night Norbie introduces Al to the lost art of drinking absinthe (complete with sugar cube and special spoon) and when Norbie goes to retrieve that cursed liquor from his suitcase he inadvertently reveals a huge cache of money - $60,000 to be exact. The next day Al confesses his wonder at the mysterious amount of money to Eulalia and she begins to fill his head with criminal ideas.
When I embarked on oen of my adevntures in the local library, I saw this book lolling on the shelf all by itself. Raking pity on it, I took it off the shelf and read the blurb - it sounded like a fun read. So after some rather complicated fiddling with the machine that lives to judge my choice in fiction, a strained conversation with the library attendant who also seems to ive to judge my choice in fiction, and a large traffic jam which may/may not also live to judge my choice in fiction, I finally got to read this book. And I had my doubts, but after I got to about page twenty they were all blown into dust. Also, because I didn't actually read more than three words of the blurb, I had no idea what the book was about.
Volare unicanitor suede-over-plastic saddle.
Today I am Grateful for the 'Housecoat Fairy' Every morning I wake up, reach into the closet and put on my housecoat. Every morning it is hanging there, despite my leaving it in the bathroom the day before. (or on the bedroom floor or flung over the rocking chair) I probably don't say thank-you enough for the everyday 'little things' so today 'Housecoat Fairy' you are my Gratitude.
The man has a point – drinking is usually something we do with friends in social settings.
“Safe words. If I absolutely hate a piece of clothing you’re trying to argue me into, I say SHARK. SHARK means you must drop all arguing and let that article of clothing go because my dislike for it is non-negotiable. In turn, you have a safe word. If you think I’m dangerously close to looking like a suburban mom with juice stains on my shirt, you simply yell – TOFU. And I must drop said piece of clothing. TOFU has taken the item in question off the table. Everything else is up for discussion. Sound good?” I asked.
B. How many calories it has
*tweaks plot*
Sorry, time got away. Work is getting wacky, my team is exponentially increasing and I am having to spend some time smacking people down and saying things like, 'No I am NOT your bitch, you can do that yourself', and other such nice-isms that make me feel stressed. Better to establish borders and expectations now then get pissed off later. But it is hard to say no, even if it is for my own sanity.
People still recall how tough it was to watch Steve Carell get his chest hair waxed in that movie, The 40 Year Old Virgin (YouTube). No one wants a Brazilian wax for cervical cancer, no matter how close the epilation is connected to the cause!
All the ducks is dead.
Whilst our population ages and our birth rate falls, the non-European population of the world is increasing to unsustainable levels
No one except the manufacturers and owners of the windmills like windmills. This includes environmentalists! In June environmental and watchdog groups filed a lawsuit in Boston to stop a windmill farm off Cape Cod charging that it would violate federal law by endangering protected migratory birds. The suit says that “science was manipulated and suppressed for political reasons.”
I went through all my files for work that I had at home over the winter. Getting rid of duplicates and filing papers properly.
The gain is not a surprise, at least, not as I look back on how I ate this week. I had fast food three, maybe four times this week. I had two or three sodas to drink per day. I did not drink anywhere near enough water at work. I also had a BLT kinda week at work. If I could put it in my mouth… I did. Bites of cheese, licks of sauce, tastes of cake, and cookies. Add to that the fact that the previous week I did none of my nightly exercises, and still am not doing my sit ups and push ups again.
Independence, Missouri: The “center place” where the New Jerusalem would be built and the Savior would return. Near the Garden of Eden. A temple was to be built in Joseph Smith’s generation in preparation for the Second Coming of Christ, but persecution by evil non-Mormons thwarted the work of the Lord, and the gathering place was moved north and east. At some point, faithful Mormons expect to be called to abandon their homes and their worldly goods and gather to the New Jerusalem.
Cognition and Alcohol
If we want advertising to be full of talented interesting, diverse people from different backgrounds, the demise of the post room makes it that bit harder. The advertising business needs to solve this problem.
The Stuck Mash
1) Wait. She's talking about letting real time pass before you write about a traumatic event. Some writers wait years before tackling the traumas they cannot forget. But the traumatic events here happen to one of my characters.
After being flabbergasted by such opulence, my loving wife Sangeetha in levity remarked, “This king must have been a brat (given he was only about 19 when he died), for who in life (or death) really needs such luxuries. Such wealth seems to indicate that the king had subjects who served him and a good king is one who serves his subjects, not the other way round!” To this our beloved five year old son, Reuben questioned, “We must be nice to him, because he is a king, correct?” seeking my support.
I've been developing this recipe over the past month, and have discovered many variations that work -- but this one is the clear winner. Its texture is sublime, and the flavors are like autumn distilled into a soup. Truly heavenly -- and perfect for a Meatless Monday!
Amen (which means: let it be)
1) my brother moved out of the state almost a year ago already.. and is getting married in August.
But go and learn what this means: ‘I desire mercy, not sacrifice.’ For I have not come to call the righteous, but sinners.”
No girls. No friends. It was me and me alone, which continued for years. I was terrified to leave the house because every time I did, I seemed to be attacked, beaten and humiliated. Sometimes by a single person, sometimes by a large group of them.
Prosecutors say a Kansas City, Mo., man gave sedative-laced ice cream to several young girls and filmed them in pornographic poses while they were unconscious.
And I didn’t look crazy.
I got the impression that this venue means a lot to his team, because it’s their community. Over a lifetime in Tim’s case: his origins and his family and of course a lot of the talent he works with to this day are based here. I feel like it’s personally satisfying for him and his production crew.
The dialogue between Kerrick and Avery was one of my favorite parts of the novel. Avery isn’t afraid to stand up for herself and she is a very strong character. It was interesting to see these two butting heads.
BILL.
Gleick’s story doesn’t add up, given that many of the details in the phony “strategy memo” could only have been composed by someone with prior access to the complete board materials that Gleick says he subsequently sought out. So far Gleick is the only person known to have had access to the Heartland internal board documents. And he has not been forthcoming about the details of the phony memo. Was there a postmark? Did he keep the envelope and the original document that he scanned? Why does he think he was singled out to receive this information, rather than a reporter? The only thing missing right now to make Gleick’s story weaker is an old Woodstock typewriter.
And, here's the corner of the nursery I added them to! (Doesn't the glider look great in there too! Here's how I slipcovered the cushions...) I love the pop they provide, and they're the first thing you see entering the room.
“Several thousand fishes died in a river near the Indo-Bangladesh border in remote West Khasi Hills district last weekend prompting an official probe into the matter, officials said today. Dead floating fishes were first detected by local anglers on Friday last at river Kynshi, 150 km from here.
- Martine Franck
So I reconsidered but decided to keep going.
When my food gets there, I will eat at it happily and slowly to make it last. Jeff would come out to say hello to me. “Haven’t seen you in awhile.” Jeff would exclaim. “You’re getting big!” Jeff would say with a tender smile. “Yes well, that’s how it goes in this family. You’re short until you’re 12 or” -I would cough- “13 and you shoot right up past Mom.” I would reply, returning the smile. “Yes, yes!” Jeff would smile. “How’s fantasy hockey going?” Jeff would ask Rose. “Championship!” Rose would grin; Jeff would nod and say “Good for you! Who are you facing?” “My mom.” Rose would answer.
Storage Solutions:
Anyway, the experiment was supposed to end this morning, when the delivery truck was scheduled to bring our new, smallish-but-still-more-standard-size fridge. (It's very hard to find a small fridge of any quality on this side of the Atlantic. Or the Pacific. The Europeans and Japanese have it all over us in this regard.) But alas, the one they brought arrived with a big scratch along its very visible exterior side. They'll return with another one in a few days.
Doyle looked him over, nodding with his own plans seeming to take shape in his mind. “Then don’t change out of your hunting clothes. The story will carry more impact when readers see photographs of you arriving at the hotel and receiving word of Elizabeth’s disappearance. It will show that you aren’t thinking of yourself. Only her. It also gives you a more western, local appeal than in your usual expensive, tailored suit and tie.” He checked the time. “If I write fast, I can get the story in today’s edition.”
He's a very dangerous man, you know. Bent on total destruction.
1/2 c chopped celery
As a taxpayer and patient of the Aneurin Health Board ...
With particular reference to trade issues the background logic to this agreement is evident: the EU wants to catch up with the US which signed in 2004 a free trade agreement with CA states and the Dominican Republic since this geographical Spanish-speaking region is commercially and strategically important to the EU.
The question is, what does a grown do? I mean, honestly, what would Strummer do? What would Douglas Adams say? And is it perhaps a not unpromising thing (to, at the very last minute, take a glass-half-full perspective) that I still really have no idea what I want to do with my life? Or perhaps I know – let’s admit that – but getting there. Well’s that’s the tricky bit.
He confesses I inspire him.
I couldn’t possibly cover the ground Wayne covered over several hours, but here is a little bit of it in the form of a few of my tweets (you can follow me at ShawnHarmsen1) quoting him during his presentation (I take no credit, just passing some nuggets along):
Still talking about my job, I'm handling two freelance works now. I rush home after office and crack my brains to think, analyze and write. Both jobs require me to prepare researches that are a bit out of my comfort zone. I'm still figuring out how to untangle the ropes but hopefully, (please pray for me) I'll be able to accomplish everything on time and later make my clients happy. Speaking about my freelance jobs, I was able to serve three clients over the past months. One of the clients was "unfortunately or fortunately?" a relative and up to this date, they left me hanging in the tree of uncertainty. I fulfilled my responsibility of doing the job, I hope they fulfill their role as a client too.
I recommend adding more agave nectar or honey than the recipe says. The first time I made them they didn’t stick together well. This time I added approximately 1/2 cup of peanut butter and 1/2 cup of agave, and they stuck together much better. Again, it depends on how you like them. You can always add more and re-refrigerate before making them if you decide they’re not sticking together well.
129. Run With the Horseman: Ferrol Sams
The only change was the sesame seed oil - didn't have any. So I used olive oil and sesame seeds. I also only marinated for 1/2 hour.
I can’t believe I am averaging one post a month now. This is unacceptable!
the subway car. His skin was dark and his face unshaven.
I’ve already told you the rather dramatic incident I had at my current job when I tried to talk to my boss about being invisibly ill. You can read all about it here. Let’s face it – being invisibly ill is going to start a lot of awkward conversations. ESPECIALLY in the workplace.
The B-side of "Eight Miles High" -- a song titled "Why" -- was influenced more by Shankar's sitar music. Some people thought that McGuinn was playing a sitar on that song, but he was actually playing his trusty 12-string Rickenbacker guitar through a homemade distortion booster. Here's "Why":
Additionally, discover the endless possibilities of using technology in your craft as stages become research labs with installations, video projections and other dynamic interactive technologies. Participants will learn the ups and downs of technology, hear from experts in their field and will get a Papertronics Lunar module to make and take home.
Looking neither to the left nor right,
My kindergarteners have now spent the better part of the year together, working, playing, and learning.
Perhaps we could try opening out the theme suggestion for future weeks as well. Why not suggest a theme or two when you comment on this call and I will try and make use of your suggestions in the weeks to come. Just give me a possible theme and I will try and root out an archive image to illustrate it with and that can serve as our call. And I will incorporate a nice big link back to the blogger who suggested the theme.
Leadership with a Capital P
According to Weber’s annual GrillWatch Survey, less than 40% of grill owners clean their equipment with any bit of frequency, and 6 percent admit they’ve never cleaned their grill at all.
Back when I was in grade school, I only went to the library when I had to do research for a project or paper. Now I’m there weekly taking advantage of all they have to offer.
To giving their shared tale a crack
That being said, here's the video. My sweetie was doing a training for his sales agents yesterday (which I thought was odd for a Wednesday - because it was really Thursday.) He wanted enlighten his agents and help them start of 2012 on the right foot. So a video about teamwork seemed most appropriate. And since I really appreciate the teamwork in a recent custom jewelry order, I thought this would be appropriate here too! So enjoy... TEAMWORK!
Phase Two of a bear market is when the bear lures investors back into stocks. The bear gives investors and analysts the false sense that the economy is improving and it’s okay to own stocks again. That’s where we are today. The bear did a masterful job at convincing investors to own stocks again…and, presto, the Dow Jones got back to 12,000.
In the 24 months since the first Android device became available locally, Korea has quickly become one of the top countries in Android device activations. In parallel, we’ve also seen tremendous growth in app downloads from Android Market. Korea is now the second-largest consumer of apps worldwide. Today we are adding to this momentum by bringing games to Android Market in Korea.
Hip hop is a Black subculture, for sure, but it's also an American one – a fact the full significance of which still hasn't percolated through to some quarters here. Hip hop swallows the American caboodle of initiative, ambition, enterprise, "anyone can make it if they work hard", whole.
This crooked, corrupt, piece of crap administration deserves to have every single person calling them out on every nasty, stupid thing they do, no matter how small the voice.
Indie/soul duo from Minneapolis, MN.
Those weren't my words, they were my older sister's and she would often repeat them to my little mum whenever she'd go home for a visit. Ooooh, boy, did that make my little mum mad. It wasn't just the ring set Dad purchased for Mom in Alaska one year that brought the comment, but a few other family pieces that she'd long ago decided were rightfully hers as the firstborn daughter. I'm not sure why she felt it was okay to bring it up time after time, but she did and it didn't sit well with Mom. Suzanne was a wounded soul and she would often show her ugly side at the most inopportune times.
Raising free-thinking entrepreneurs is such an incredible benefit to Unschooling. Our children do not hear that they can have their own businesses "someday." They have them NOW. They have such a head-start in comparison to children in school when it comes to living in the real world, pursuing their passions and making money from them. Our family has many businesses at this point in our life with multiple streams of income. Our children have learned so much about marketing and business through living a connected life rich with resources to nurture their interests. I want my children to know that they can always have whatever they want in life, but sometimes they need to get creative to manifest what they want. This includes the desire to help others in various ways. We recently wanted to buy my parents a Vitamix blender and we pulled together as a family to figure out how we could make money to do that for them.
and bickering going on between the children these past few weeks
Is it really sensible to poison your neighbours already cut-down tree, just to ensure it will never grow tall again?
Rockhounding in Washington a Quick Geologic History
Jesus said they will not lose their reward if they even give a cup of cold water to someone in the name of a disciple. But they are not doing it in the name of a disciple but in their own name.
22. Comfortably Numb (10:26)
Anwaar: Tradition. How cruel is your hand. You have yet again been blinded by your selfishness. Injustice lives in your system, yet you choose to ignore it. Will I let you triumph? Oh Fareda, my dear, you have risked your life for women’s rights, yet society sees you as a criminal. What an outrage!
Despite my resistance to places that use the Formula (makes me feel predictable and lame), Market Table presents something unique. The ambiance is different the moment you step foot in the place, after all, the first room is an actual market with an open kitchen. Reminds me of a place in Buenos Aires that B. and I like. High ceilings and openess may not be great for intimate dinner converation, but at lunch, people tend to be less sauced.. tend.
Out of 25 girls, just one didn't earn any: while my original thought was that half the girls might earn some and that might inspire the other half, since it was just one girl I did give her a general badge instead, as I didn't want to single her out.
with tearful laughter stinging our eyes. I explained
really good stuff… thank you
7: SHIRLEY & LEE - The Engagement
Information technology costs the same amount of money everywhere. So, in a country with a relatively low cost of living for things other than IT (such as Bangladesh, Mexico, Senegal, etc.), the impact of IT will be relatively greater than in a country with a high cost of living (such as the US and Canada Germany and France, Japan, etc.).
Cut out small strips from your comics and stick them in place on the chair using a PVA glue, which has been diluted with water to turn it into a thin liquid. Cover the chair completely, making sure the pieces are smooth, and flat with no loose edges or gaps, then leave to dry.
I am really bad at one major job on the computer- organising photos. I use Picasa 3, but I have never taken the time to learn how to use it properly. I would love to learn how to correctly group photos in folders and albums, one day... one day. In this world of digital photography they sooooo quickly build up, into thousands and thousands. A great piece of advise I was given recently, was to delete the unwanted or 'bad' photos, and in the case where you have several of the same thing, choose the best and delete the rest. Such a good idea- back in the day of film I would only take 1 photo of something, not 10! So I need to work on this.
Long Beach Terrace Theater— Friday November 21
With more immigrants coming into Singapore, Singaporeans must make an extra conscious effort to make them feel welcomed, accepted and happy in Singapore.
Thus far I've held it at bay (although TOTT would now snort and say "barely" but then I bring him something coolio and he forgives. He's the awesome) I suppose if I had more friends in this zip code I might not spend my days plotting the new finds and making lists of things I want as soon as payday comes around. Okay, it might be a small problem. Very small. I window shop far more than I buy and I really choose things wisely. And if I make a mistake I return it ASAP. And so my family gifted me with the happy day of shopping!
(her daughter was killed in a car crash)
Equivocation follows any membership request,
For would-be guests, we have some fantastic rooms with views offered at late availability discounted rates for a stay this public holiday long weekend. So if you are looking for a break and fancy one in the Lakes, do check out our website to see what we have to offer. We’d love to have you staying with us, and our B&B can be booked online or over the phone.
My love of English got a huge boost from my having one grandparent who told me to “go up the apples and pears and into Uncle Ned“, and another who called me, happily, a “pawky wee thing”. My father’s mother was born in Birmingham, but lived in Falkirk from the age of four, so I am surprised to read that “pawky” is British rather than Scots. My mother’s father used a little rhyming slang, and she came to Falkirk in 1957, so I was surprised to learn that “wersh”, sour, which I learned from her, is Scots rather than English. So difficult it is to classify language.
Mumia rots on death row for a crime he most likely did not commit while rich white boys get away with sanctioning the use of torture whilst crying freedom for all.
FrenchRivieraPropertySearch.com
I could probably think of others, but this will do for now. I know this is too little too late, but it’s my way of honoring her on her birthday. It’s my way of saying that in spite of my inattention to her since I left home some 37 years ago, I learned from her, profited from her wisdom, and am a better person for having been her son. Happy 83rd Birthday, Mother.
Siganeui Choom tells the story of these people, remembering the original immigrants and the families that they created as they tried to build a home away from home. Factual details and explanations are sparse in the Song’s piece as Siganeui Choom is more a private filmic history of a handful Korean-Cuban families than the typical, information-filled documentary. Fourth and fifth generation Coreanos are interviewed about their ancestors, memories that are supplemented with coverage of their own modern-day lives and identities as Korean-Cubans. The approach does not give much of an insight into the past and current situation (political, economic, social, etc.) of Korean-Cubans as a whole, but offers individual and often very personal stories.
Hi Toads and Friends:
YOU ARE THE MASTER
After the death of Naoise, Conchobar took Deirdre as his wife. After a year, angered by Deirdre's continuing coldness, Conchobar asked her whom in the world she hated the most, besides himself. She answered "Éogan mac Durthacht," the man who'd murdered Naoise. Conchobar said that he would give her to Éogan. As she was being taken to Éogan, Conchobar taunted her, saying she looked like a ewe between two rams. At this, Deirdre threw herself from the chariot, dashing her head to pieces against a rock. In some versions of the story, she died of grief.
it may sound like an oxymoron, but i believe that sometimes the only constant thing in our lives is the ever-changing rediscovery of self. the perpetual notion of consistent growth rather than stagnantly sitting in a situation that suffocates and stifles that growth.–how’s that for alliteration? boo ya!–rediscovery is a type of growth that doesn’t always mean rainbows and butterflies, but more so the positive idea of moving forward in the acceptance of the highs and lows that we experience in life.
Veteran anime fans no doubt recall watching Onegai Teacher/Twins, two of 2002 and 2003′s best series. Screenwriter and creator Kuroda Yousuke, partnering with AnoHana director Nagai Tatsuyuki, gives you this season Ano Natsu de Matteru, a story about students creating a film over the summer, and finding much more. Kaito Kirishima (Shimazaki Nobunaga) is an average first-year high school student who enjoys video and film. He recently bought a new camera to film with, but while he is standing on a bridge at night, a bright light flashes above him and a force of wind knocks his head back into a rail before he feels himself falling. He wakes up the next day believing it to be a dream. At school, word gets around of a new transfer student by the name of Ichika Takatsuki (Tomatsu Haruka) who is a senior that Kaito’s friend Tetsurou Ishigaki (Ogihara Hideki) already knows detailed information about. Kaito ends up meeting her as she is eating lunch with fellow senior Remon Yamano (Tamura Yukari). It’s here Tetsurou tells Ichika about Kaito’s upcoming movie ideas and solicits her to appear in the film, while Remon volunteers herself after Ichika agrees. Kaito’s other female friends, Mio Kitahara (Asumi Kana) and Kanna Tanigawa (Ishihara Kaori) also agree to the film, rather reluctantly. On his way home, Kaito encounters Ichika trying to fish in a river without fish. She seems to be dragging a suitcase with her, suggesting she does not have a place to stay. He agrees to let her stay with him for the night, but a strange mark on his neck starts to give him trouble, and she tries to help through the use of alien technology as his sister and Kanna walk in.
I’ve come to believe that this is good advice for some people: the “moderators.” They do better when they try to make moderate changes, when they avoid absolutes and bright lines.
Zelda Rubenstein – Tangina
These streets are carefree. My mind is full, thinking of her. My smile has slipped a little in the time since we last met. There’s something about this feeling of waiting and watching out for the person I hope will come around the corner. Good conversation is in short supply, but that will be rectified as soon as I see her. Waiting for a friend is the most difficult thing in the world, knowing that they will come, but not knowing when. I rehearse my words, so I am ready, so I don’t waste a single solitary little tiny word.
feel needed. In the relationship, couples need to express love by showing and giving to
Lexicon word of the day: Lambent.
Having had the misfortune of being carted to hospital in an ambulance a few days ago, Ive been able to, or should I say had little else to do but, think about writing. Fortunately, I’ve got my little phone here with me so I’ve been able to keep abreast of the latest tweets and blogs of this amazing, newfound community as well as consider how I fit into it. Or perhaps, how it fits into me.
The mermaid ran her hands through her hair – a single strand floated away and settled on Gerald’s arm…a thread of pure gold…
I don’t know why but I picked it up and dusted it off and literally stuck it in front on the 5D and hey presto, it worked even better than it used to.
I though once out of the monotony of dirty nappies and night feeds,
the world grows a little lighter.
Experts at the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention say such canine gas attacks felled workers at four veterinary clinics between 2006 and 2011, and such incidents “might be underreported.” All of the workers (and dogs) involved in the four cases recovered, the report added.
I hope you've enjoyed the 24 tags I've created following along with Tim and the 12 Tags of Christmas and the Wendy Vecchi version. The lessons I learned will be fun to put to use in future art pieces.
one step forward
I looked back to find my ski, my poles, my dignity. Another skier delivered my equipment, and I turned back to see my perpetrator inches away.
I had to film the entire piece on Green Screen as I couldn’t get locations that were accessible when my actors were available etc etc, so couldn’t do a large amount of movement but it did allow me to play with the scope of the piece and the transitions on scene changes. Example; were the actor remains visible as the scene changes around them and then they sit into that scene, using a prop (glass of bourbon) as their focal point.
All you have to do is click on Natalie's name above. That will take you straight to the post on her blog where you can enter!
Whereas normal scenes take about 1000 words, these scenes are taking 2000-3000 words.
…and have fewer blisters.
Now I don't want to be negative and it's possible that I am merely a pessimist (although I will defend myself by insisting on the term realist), but when I look and listen to the news that surrounds both micro and macro economic issues to me it appears there is trouble on the horizon.
I downloaded it because of all the hype I've heard about the book via twitter, facebook, and my dear, fellow bloggers. I was looking forward to a quality read with a seriously scandalous side.
Stay in Washington where the press can hammer you.
.....picking up from where we left off last time, chef Eric Sapet's first course on the autumn game menu at La Mirande's cooking class was compote de lievre a la royale, pain grille, et salade d'automne, or, coarsely pureed wild hare on toast with an autumn salad.
I've wanted to blog for a while but haven't had the chance. This seems like the perfect time, five AM. Is insomniac blogging the same as drunk blogging?
Why is bad funny?
Well…no ailment that is, apart from one, being a big ole fatty!
Place the Christmas pudding into the double boiler for cooking. Be sure to check the water level every 30 minutes to make sure it doesn't boil dry. Add more boiling water as needed.
Right in the fucking jewels.
There is even a Vegetable Butcher on the premises (and where else can you find one?), who will prep your veggies for you. In addition, you will find Le Verdure, a restaurant specializing in Italian-style vegetable dishes, so vegetarians will want to visit here.
Frogs in a Hole
The come back wasn’t to be though as the Stars took the lead with 6 minutes to go before adding the empty netter to make sure they became double winners.
****The best thing about this headline is that it a) suggests that at some point someone was concerned about this and b) doesn't clarify whether it's the band or the bird. It's the bird, although I think one can safely assume the band is also not radioactive. Story: Adult muttonbirds migrate to the North Pacific. Last year when they got there they fed in the seas off the east coast of Japan, and due to fallout from the Fukushima-Daiichi nuclear plant, ingested radioactive cesium isotopes. Then they came back to NZ and had baby muttonbirds, which people go and hunt, because they are delicious. (These people are referred to as 'muttonbirders' and they go 'muttonbirding', which is why "The Deer Hunter" was a terrible title for a movie.) Because of the concern, the Department of Conservation caught 30 pre-season muttonbirds, prepared them as if they were about to be eaten, and tested them for radioactivity. They were not radioactive. And that is what I do at work.
One of the most ill-fated trips I ever took was to the Greenwood Cemetery in Orlando, FL. The tour guide began by presenting photographs and EVPs previously caught in the cemetery, and as he did so, I realized my camera was still in my car. So I ran out to get it, tripped on the brick driveway, and landed hard on my hands and knees, leaving rivulets of blood running down my leg (luckily the group all contributed handiwipes and Bandaids along with condolences). Then, while taking the first picture, my camera’s brand new batteries drained. When the tour was over and we returned to our vehicles, mine wouldn’t start, despite all attempts to jump start it, and a friend had to come pick me up. Spiritual activity or just plain bad luck? At least on that night I felt a bit singled out.
Complimentary 2 hours use of Kid’s Adventure Zone for kids (kids must wear long sleeves and socks)
There's no place like home.
I've tried different methods of yogurt making, but in the end making the yogurt in a crock-pot seems the easiest to me. One thing I did invest in was a digital food thermometer. The $10 cost was worth it to me, to be able to preset a target temperature and walk away until the signal beeps that the temp has been reached. I have a 7 qt crockpot, you may need to adjust the recipe to fit your own.
Seksy Watches – A Must Have For Every Fashionista!
I am so happy that love can linger on and never die even if your loved one will never come back to return it.
Item – Accept from any kart for anniversary appearance Get a gold bays in every cup in the Admirable Prix on 150cc mirror that you didn’t use to alleviate R.O.B.
The first evening we were in a packed restaurant. "Years ago that wouldn't have been possible," said my companion, as a young black family came in and was shown to the last empty table. I engaged my mouth before my brain. "Why not?" I said. And then I remembered. Being a child of the fifties wasn't just cowboy films. It was also segregation. So we started talking about protest. We weren't drinking tea. She had watermelon juice and I had rice milk with cinnamon. We were a long way from Gloucestershire and I had a lot to learn.
Maybe that is true and maybe it is not but I see how difficult a mother/daughter relationship can be and I have only been at it for seven years.
mistake including millions of dollars for every
So now that's it for Onam. It was fun fun fun. And it really brought us all (staff, students, kids) together and made it feel like a community. Why can't everything feel like that? Community is the bomb.
They are actually more durable today then they were ten years ago thanks to modern technology that has provided the means to scale them down and make them more durable. We are simply as a society far more connected to the virtual world than we ever have been, most people that opt for laptop computers do so because they want to be able to be in any room or any location for that matter and use their computer. Pricing has come way down, to the point where it is one fourth of the price it was ten years…
Debut Game Bat
I can sit back and enjoy my meal
“From the four corners of the earth people are coming to their senses, are running back to GOD.” Psalm 22:27 (The Message Bible)
He is opening his very own shop ...DADS PRIMITIVE WORKBENCH ( address to follow)....not only will he have his beautiful handmades and amazing vintage picks available for purchase , but he has 10 vendors from Ohio and West Virginia offering primitive antiques and old cabin handmades ! I do not have a list of names compiled to share with you ...but take my word ..he has some very VERY popular prim talent selling wares in his shop and know also that a journey to visit with Charlie ...will NEVER be a disappointment !
Chapter List:
him? with common
Oh-oh, I got dem party political blues
This has been discussed with some people arguing that the craft beer moniker for some British beer is a misnomer and should only be used when in reference to beer produced by our American ale cousins on the other side of the Atlantic. This is a rather knee jerk, rigid and dogmatic response that maintains that under no circumstances should the term "craft beer" or "craft beer revolution" be used to describe the product or the upturn in interest and sales of some of our most exciting and progressive brewers and breweries.
Martin Giovinazzo, 34, New York, N.Y.
Bonus Points if your story is not actually about vampires.
This week my questions are going to themed…as in they are all about blogging and just to throw you off – there are more than 5 this time!!
my hands beneath your hands
The "Island" Whispers:
About GIIP
From there we needed to know where God was calling us to. So we began to put everyone’s Scripture verses on the board. Once all of these were on the board, we began to see a pattern. There were verses that kept repeating, themes that came up again and again. We began to see a picture of where God was calling us to. There were many things in our “Future Story” that needed to be done, but they weren’t being done. Through these verses we could now begin to see that God was saying to us: “Have faith in me, do big things, reach out to people, make sacrifices.” Those were the themes that kept reappearing, and it’s what lead leadership to begin to tackle some of the “big” things within their future story (long range plan).
But truly, the most compelling thing I want to tell you voyeuristic pawns of my narcissistic needs is this:
While he lay dying, she was still alive. When he was dead, she was still alive. Still alive. Still alive.
This shelf stored cushions, jars, vases and large glasses that I used for for his 1st birthday party I had a huge lolly table...maybe I should do a post on that as well, portacot, empty basket and a bunnykins dinnerware set.
When I had to get glasses
From UPI:
The dining table and chairs moved to a wall where it has never been and it's far better off there. I even had a light installed above where the table would be, and now is, in anticipation.
Meet Lilly Craig, Brae's 6 year old sweetie. Thank you Lilly for answering some fun questions for Just ask the Kids!
Freedom.
Lord, please help those who hear of You today make a decision to follow You and not wait a minute longer. And here’s a simple poem . . .
On the way back to the office, Jane said, 'You know,It's such a beautiful day...
Almost two hundred years later, Forbes Bramble can be found writing in The strange case of Deacon Brodie, 1976: “On the bare boards of the floor stood several bottles of Bell's ‘black cork’, thick, black ale more intoxicating than wine”. But this is not a contemporary source, and there is no reason to believe that Bramble hasn't just made a guess at what black cork was.
Jamie Moyer was teammates with Davey Lopes … and Ron Cey … and Dick Ruthven … and Jim Sundberg … and Manny Trillo.
Compared to Part One, Part Two is an improvement. It doesn’t feel quite as much like watching half of a movie, and there is significantly more action, significantly more plot, and is significantly more interesting. (And the characters don’t spend half the movie camping in the woods aimlessly, which helps.) There is a sequence of dense flashback exposition, but it is necessary for explaining the nuances of a plot twist. (And, to be honest, it may have just seemed talky, because the rest of the movie is so relentlessly climactic.)
LylesBrother is NutsAboutJapan!
However what is most interesting about this invitation is what it tells us about how the leadership of the TUC view its role - not as an agent of organisation of our class but as the institutional expression of partnership with Government and employers.
Back in the car, the low tire pressure light on the dashboard was still yellow as I drove away heading for the next convenience store a little ways down the road. After locating the air pump I was happily surprised to find it equipped with an actual debit or credit card reader, this would have bypassed my lack of sufficient coinage solving my problem in one neat swoop. Like the non-bank ATM at the previous store I was a little worried about what it might charge but the city traffic was getting exponentially worse as I was getting sleeper and figured it was worth the risk. Unfortunately, my luck remained the same and after sliding the card through, the little LCD screen did not change. Sliding the card a couple of more times only resulted in me verbalizing even more salty language to the point I was again drawing the attention of the nearby commuters at the gas pumps.
The greenbelt at the end of my road lies on the edge of the motorway linking the suburbs with the city. On one side of the motorway is a dairy farm with a small lake and an old Cape Dutch homestead. On the other side is a river, horse paddocks and the edge of pine plantations which go on to rise halfway up the mountain. The view from the hill looks out over rolling vineyards and towards the towering granite face of the side of Table Mountain. It’s beautiful. A picture of God’s grandeur and verdancy.
Eleffhunts! are fany, they have very
This afternoon, LaSalle Investment Management, part of the Jones Lang LaSalle group (NAMA’s Head of Portfolio Management, John Mulcahy’s former employer) has announced the purchase from NAMA of a shopping centre in Dumbarton in Scotland. The 120,000 sq ft Artizan shopping centre (pictured here) had been associated with Northern Ireland developer, Jermon Developments, though it is unclear at this stage if that company was involved in the sale. The price paid is confirmed by LaSalle to be GBP 4.85m (€5.5m). The shopping centre has substantial vacancy at present – said by LaSalle to be 33 % vacant by estimated rental value (“ERV”) and 54% vacant by net leasable area.
Love the blood clot uniform on LaRoche, so I couldn't pass it up when someone made me an offer. The 70s were a messed up time uniform-wise. The Bobby Winkles manager card is great not just cuz of a name like Winkles, but you also have a coach names Salty Parker. Just don't nickname them like that anymore. I had a CRAPLOAD of offers for the Mike Andrews. Only a rookie Mantle would have pried that away. 73 Topps had some amazing pictures.
9. Irresistible 03:03
I am entering it in the following challenges
If you’re mostly a bourbon drinker and haven’t had much luck with scotch, this is a premium single malt you just might enjoy.
You create the center of the bow by wrapping the two ends under and then back over the bow a few times until you are satisfied. You may prefer to create a chain of stitches to wrap around the bow instead. Finish off and weave in ends. I like to leave the ends in case I need them to sew the bow onto something else.
Xin Yee added another twelve pets into her Littlest Pet Shop family. Much to her delight her mom bought her new additions from the Philippines. This brought her collection up to twenty-five! And I am sure she would want the number to grow.
DW: Do you think the failure of the Russian airplane that had their entire hockey team onboard was in any way related to this war?
Five choirs joined the movement, bringing hundreds of young people together for haiti. The choirs include Uganda Rural Fund Childrens' Choir, the Crescendo Chorus of Connecticut, the famed Voices of Eve 'n Angels -- the Voena Childrens' Choir of California, the Pacoima Singers of California, and the PS22 Chorus of Staten Island, NY.
Crumbles are one of my favorite things to eat. (But for the record, what is the difference is between a “crumble” and a “crisp”?). This French version had the added bonus of a thick eggy custard in addition to the delicious pear morsels, the sweet crumbles and the light vanilla bean ice cream.
So how do you know if he is really confused and isn’t stringing you along until his ‘Ms. Right’ comes along? I’ve often heard, if a man wants to be with you he will be with you. While I agree to a certain extent with this statement, I don’t think it’s always that simple. Sometimes there really are other factors preventing him from being with you despite the fact that he actually wants to; but most times if a man feels you are the one, he won’t be so confused and his actions won’t change so frequently.
CF1T best: P18 TRU (1:30.783) L34
I think the thing I love most is being able to contribute to the literary world. I have read a good number of books in my time (I would estimate at least a thousand), and so, contributing my voice to the world is exciting and humbling. Hopefully others will gain enjoyment from the stories that I enjoy writing and reading.
a. Hawkman
1. Punk Rock Academy
For the moment though, let me share with you an image of a little guy (not him exactly, since his brief time with me was spent being held and nursed, not with cameras flashing at him) who shared my morning with me today. Not of his choice exactly. I’m sure he thought he had more time than he did as he tried to swoop in front of our car.
Is it Aussie strength or is it USD weakness and what the difference might mean.
This was the first figure I found that used the 'spawn' moniker (I used a Moniker once- she kept calling me for weeks after).
When you submit your first grades of the year, you also send in your course plan — that is, a list of what you’ve actually decided to teach. There is no expectation that you will follow the Kolbe-provided course plans to the letter. Every single plan says, “adapt these to your needs”. Often there are suggestions on how to lighten the load if your student is overwhelmed. There are sometimes suggestions on how to grade, but you make the final decision. You can also just chuck the Kolbe-suggested book and do something else, or skip the subject entirely depending on which subject. If you call or post on the forums, they will suggest alternatives if you don’t like the default book.
The butter was the clincher; look for a post on it later this week.
Everybody thinks I’ve lost my mind, it’s true,
Lactose Sugar added to kettle during Boil; fermented with our house Ale yeast.
I can't tell you how your morning routine should look but will lay mine out as an example and put some links at the end for you to check out and get ideas from. Below the items are listed and after the list I will expand on each one a little more.
or a musician actiing in the role of a statistician
She knocked once.
C’ya
Will you vote the values that will stand the test of fire? Some things are more important than high gas prices or a faltering economy. They are life, marriage and freedom. This November, Catholics must stand up and protect their sacred rights and duties.
Pope Benedict XVI said last Thursday that, “we must first recall that the unity of the Church flows from the perfect oneness of the triune God. In John’s Gospel, we are told that Jesus prayed to his Father that his disciples might be one, “just as you are in me and I am in you” (Jn 17:21). This passage reflects the unwavering conviction of the early Christian community that its unity was both caused by, and is reflective of, the unity of the Father, Son, and Holy Spirit.” Blessed Maria Gabriella offered her life that the unity of the Three Divine Persons might one day be manifested perfectly in the community of believers that is the Church.
Here's the thing: there is an 80% LESS chance of being blown out of the sky by a terrorists than there is of being killed in a fire. Let me say that again, you have more to fear from fire than from a terrorist. Don't believe me, read this. The scare tactics used to create a sense of urgency and need to comply are just that, scare tactics. We are not any less safe for not taking of our shoes at the security line, nor are we any more safe for being felt up by TSA.
Olive oil- 1/2 tbsp
I'm a bitch in the afternoon
“We may need more ammunition than this,” Pete stated flatly.
All the life and power of true religion consists in the inward and full persuasion of the mind. Religion itself is made of two components: a profession of faith toward God and an outward form of worship. If we are not fully persuaded in our own minds that our faith is true and our form of worship is well-pleasing, we are conducting an exercise in hypocrisy and adding to our list of offenses toward God. This being the nature of religion, the only force that can be used therein is not force at all, but admonishments, exhortations, arguments, and advice.
1442 **D-X/22/2002. “Orestes, His Companion Pylades, and the Nature of Justice.” Faculty Workshop, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2003(2), above, pp. 765-72.)
Poly & mono unsaturated fats: now I won’t get hung up on the chemical differences between mono & poly and instead, I’ll focus on the fact that they’re both heart healthy and GOOD for you! It is considered the best type of fat you can consume. They are found mainly in fish, nuts, seeds and oil from plants. They may help to lower blood cholesterol when using them in place of saturated or trans-fats options.
I've been wandering the Marais area all afternoon. I wound up continuing to shop--buying some old paper and an embroidery stamp at an antique shop in the Village St. Paul area which was, the shop I mean, stuffed to the brim with small items--sewing supplies, linens, buttons, items for school kids of earlier years, etc. While I was in the coffee house earlier, I had read through a picture book about the author's school days in the 50's and many of the things he mentioned were for sale there in the shop. I then found a "vintage", ie used, clothing store. I've been in search of a skirt as I overpacked shirts but found one pair of jeans, one pair shorts (not appropriate for Paris) and one dress wasn't quite the right mix of clothes. I didn't find a skirt that fit in the store but I got three great floral short sleeved blouses--one by Cacharel--probably from the 80's. I'm happy. While waiting for the changing room, I watched some French ladies browsing through the dresses--they favored red ones-- and some Asian (probably Japanese) girls trying on shorts. They were giggling in the dressing room for the longest time and left an enormous mess of empty hangers. I asked the sales girl and she said they did spend a fair bit which I hope justified the extra work they left her.
A person who is ruled by their imperfections will be hard pressed to let any mistake go. I remember a time that if I missed prayer and bible study in the morning, my thoughts for the entire day were consumed with my failure. I was scum. A horrible, undisciplined being who didn’t deserve God’s love.
over a flame. The fire gently nibbles
B-Side "Real Fantasy" is just an electric piano and a single direct voice... still playing with a lot of fun weirdo sounds, coming up with a bassline out of a stuttery low end thump, and looser than the flipside with the vocal messing with a nasaly soul sound. All chopped up and going for a big multilayerd chorus again. These electronics in whatever way they're reassembled sounds completely contemporary, like a rewinding tape recorder in the late '90s. It's gigantically playing with DJ tools and dance culture in an experimental-pop way with a sped up thin acoustic. There isn't a single sound that hasn't been processed into oblivion for the sake of surprising fun. Playing with those clear precise points as much as the broad swaths of hiss, because Dan's not keeping it completely sterile. Like the next one, "Gave Away and Broke" where a hyper rhythm becomes a larger reference point, like a crazy experiment to take an impossible BPM and build anything useable around it. Impenetrably dense, an inconceivable number of hours spent on reverse organs, wah guitar, late night pulg switchery, while staying restrained on vocal it's a headspinning whirl of that mixup ride, the one that keeps spinning faster and you try not to barf holding onto that metal ring in the center.
7 iron
“Why are we walking?” Hank asked as he tried to keep up with Chris.
Good morning! And a beautiful sunny morning it is! About time after all those chilly mornings we have been having! Unfortunately we are in the boat yard at the moment and it is FILTHY here! There is sanding dust and paint dust and metal dust everywhere! Uggh! Got to hate yard periods. Hopefully just a week or two more to go though and we will be back in the water!
I am so mad. I am so sad. I am ________. I don't know. I don't who or what I am. How can this be going on inside my body with no symptoms? Besides the lump in my breast, I'm as healthy as a horse. If someone put a gun to my head I could probably run a marathon. It would hurt but I could do it. I look and feel perfectly healthy. Okay, I could lose the 20 lbs I still haven't lost from my pregnancy but come on. My hair is longer and healthier than it's ever been. My nails are even long and manicured. It is not me.
5. Add the Versatile Blogger Award to your blog post.
The wires are far from comfortable and I tend to toss and turn and a few times I had to be waken up to have the wires reattached.
It stuck with me...mostly because it was so true. The more I thought about it, the more I thought about what my own graph would look like, or kitchens I had worked in. What were those moments where we moved up?
I also have a scarred tongue, and everything tastes like charcoal and pain.
Although humans, not robots, are at the controls, the average delay is a miraculous 36 seconds. To take all those passengers by air would require 667 aircraft, each with 180 seats, or five times Japan’s fleet of Boeing 737s, estimates Macquarie, an investment bank.
I and the Father are ONE
Yes, this is a sequel. I tried to avoid major spoilers and hide anything that might be spoilery, but you WILL get some spoilers for the first book.
.....Thompson and Thomson... xD
Leda: Yes. In fact, I lived in an apartment building in a housing project in southeast Washington, and we kids ran in and out of each other’s apartments all the time. Our parents were very communal, sharing child-rearing and food and everything else, and they also knew how to have fun. For example, we had an ongoing water pistol battle with our neighbors across the hall. In my flawed memory, we opened the apartment door only after donning raincoats. I’ve tried to write about this, but it’s hard to write a picture book with guns in it, even if they’re plastic.
The Audi A7 five-door coupe’s design is a look that cannot be replicated, and carries a timeless presence that turns heads everywhere it goes. It is both sporty and elegant. Perfectly, the technology of the Audi A7 matches its revolutionary looks, as it’s the first car in the world to feature factory-installed Wi-Fi with Audi connect and navigation with the 3D mapping of Google Earth. From the groundbreaking MMI touchpad and its gracefully integrated display screen, to the state-of-the-art head up display, the Audi A7 is the currently the epitome of progressive design and sophisticated engineering. The A7 also sets a high standard for performance, handling and efficiency with an all-aluminum Audi 3.0 liter TFSI V6 engine, featuring 310 hp and 440.6 Nm of torque. The engine itself is award winning, as it was featured in WardsAuto’s list of 10 Best engines for 2012. Appropriately and competitively priced, the 2012 A7 carries an MSRP of $68,600 in Canada.
I got this great idea from a friend Lynne Kirsh Her Craftiness! Thanks Lynne!! Anyway you stack about 8 pieces of toilet paper then get wet... get out the water then make into a big piece again then run thru Big Shot with cuttlebug folder(or Sizzix folder) then ink or whatever.. I added some Perfect Pearls mist to mine thought it is hard to see..
"alone, and right, on Honduras," because the election "will come off
May 06, 2012 by: Ethan A. Huff
(jjskck)
Since then, my ministry has developed and grown, including church and nursing home ministry, Christian radio employment, and now a pastoral and podcast ministry.
And I hope that's not forgotten in this political debate.
Around 10:55, I checked but no dye release yet. I realized the bathroom was still pretty cold, so I took it to my computer & turned on my monitor & put it on top. After piddling around on my computer for a bit, I noticed the monitor wasn’t getting that warm, so I put the bag against my body under my shirt. By noon, the dye was released and I started putting it into my hair. I was done by 1:00pm. I put the rest of the paste in the freezer, and relaxed in bed under the electric blanket & 4 other blankets.
Now, let’s talk about YOLO Curve! If you’re not familiar with what YOLO Curve is then let me get you up to speed!
The Pilsener beer is treated with so large a proportion of hops, that if these were all boiled with the wort the beer would be unpalatable. The hops are therefore divided into three parts: one-third is boiled with the wort in the usual manner, another third receives only half-an-hour's boiling, and the hot wort is then run through the other third at the time of striking the pan. In this way there is a selective extraction of the tannin from the large quantity of hops, and only a partial extraction of the bitter principles ; the large amount of tannin is therefore available for interacting with the albuminoids to produce the greenish colour. The Gratz beer also receives an excessive proportion of hops, and if they were fresh hops the beer would be undrinkable. But only hops five or six years old are employed; it is well known that the storage of hops for long periods causes a destruction or disappearance of the bitter principles and the essential oil, but the tannin would not be affected.
On a personal front, I have been experiencing a lot of emotional upheaval surrounding having another baby. We have been trying for some time and no luck yet. It seems there may be some need to pursue our options at a fertility clinic. I feel funny sharing this with you but sometimes life steps into the midst of our weight loss plans and goals and takes off in another direction.
"So Ophelia, what is it that you're parents do? Assuming that your parents are still alive and that you haven't murdered them in their sleep." *Though admittedly, this last part was said under my breath*
“There is no doubt that I used drugs,” she is quoted by police. Investigators are now attempting to determine the route in which Tanaka obtained the drugs.
Whew! That's a lot. Time for me to get back to reorganizing things!
Anyway, watching the pasty dilemma of Mark Kendall in this film was like an energizing breeze gently caressing not yet gaping asshole of a lower tier porn star.
Captain Lawrence Captains Reserve Double IPA
Pioneer Fruit Juice
Ever since Brad, I have been suspicious of the modern philosophy of "me time". I happened to make a throwaway comment to this effect earlier this year, on Desert Island Discs, and honestly you'd think I'd refused to abide by the laws of gravity. At every event I have done since, the traditional "Where d'you get your ideas from?" question has been replaced by a perplexed, testy quizzing about "me time". One young man asked me if I wasn't worried about "the pram in the hallway". I asked him where the phrase came from. "Cyril Connolly." "And what did he ever write?" The questioner thought for a minute then said, "Shit. Yeah", and thanked me for "liberating him from fear". Blimey.
Hi everyone! Hope you're enjoying your weekend - we're having a cold sunny Saturday here in Porto, and I love this weather! This weekend I'll be helping out my older daughter on her Christmas sale at school. They have to raise some money for their school travel and we'll be making some pretty Christmas packages, bake some cookies, maybe sell a few old books that she doesn't read any more... I love the holiday season, so hopefully we'll manage to make beautiful things with the stuff that we have at home.
Las cosas funcionarán como indiqué en el post de información para conseguir un hueco ^^
What may be more impressive this weekend is the fact that “The Avengers” has a real shot of having a $100 million second weekend. Whew.
Write my sister a story to tell her how great she is.
I added this pic of the window in my kitchen that looks into the pool room. I took it first thing this morning. Something about it just made me think of summer days. I love my two new life rings that you can see through the window, hanging on the pool room wall. I purchased for $4.99 ea at Michaels. They're actually made of wood but you can't tell. They somehow cheer me up when I look at them. (They look really tiny in this picture but they're really not)
Ramón Salamander (more usually known simply as Salamander) attempted to take over the planet Earth in the 21st century.
Joy and peace grow out of humility, gratefulness, and communion with God. But all graces (love, joy, peace, patience, kindness, goodness, faithfulness, gentleness, self-control, and the like) are part of the fruit or evidence of the presence of the Holy Spirit in our lives and are ours because of God’s unfailing love.
They may be empty and weightless and maybe
Good Friday Morning all,
As a beginning book to the series it was charming and filled with intrigue which made you want to find out more. Christina Dodd presents this Lady Charlotte with a dilemna and as the reader you enjoy the presistance which Wynter displays.
Currently, every stream in the United States is contaminated with carcinogens. 99% of native prairies have been destroyed. 99% of old growth forests are gone. 90% of the large fish in the oceans are gone. It’s estimated that unless there is a dramatic shift in course, global warming will become irreversible in around 5 years, eventually rendering all life on this planet doomed.
Are you a bicyclist? Then you do this or you have done this. Yes, you have. None of you are the magic exception to the following. You all need a goddamn wake-up call because you simply do not comprehend the concrete reality of the following FACTS:
yet destruction in its ship
7) If you need any hardware supplies, shopping at Rona gives you air miles as well.
Charlotte Ransome is outside with her intended, but she doesn’t want to marry him, having found out that he’s only after her fortune. She breaks up with him, sending him away amidst threats, and then agrees to marry Ned Cochran. But they barely seal their agreement with a kiss when they are set upon by strangers and Ned is left bleeding and helpless on the lawn while Charlotte is spirited away.
So rested he by the Tumtum tree,
The mannequin I borrowed from my parents and put his American Legion jersey that he will be wearing this summer to play ball in....thought that looked really nice!
More important what stuck with me is the drama of perfect language.
7)All Regional Organisers and above, including national management, to undergo a polygraph lie detector test within the next 6 months.
Big Sky Brewing Company Moose Drool Brown Ale
But, the voice of Tulu Nadu is still unheard.
for as you hold me in your hands
See? That's funny too.
Friday morning, I drove around 20 miles, I'm staying in another coastal town. I paid for a week, and then maybe I'll finally make a decision about which way I'm heading.
God it was good. It's about secrets, and purpose; losing, finding, hiding, revealing. It's beautifully realised: the colours, the sounds, even the way the characters move contribute to the story. As I sat and watched I was a child again, transported to a more colourful world for a couple of hours. I cried, I laughed, I gasped.
I visited Gettysburg in September 2010 with my fiance Tony. I walked alone out into the wide open pasture which was once the Wheat Field. I felt the thick dark energy that permiated the air, crushing my chest with its heavy weight. The silence screamed at me and I could almost hear the hot breath of wild eyed horses and charging foot soldiers all around me. I did not feel alone in the least.
In a world where we have so much stuff....what a question!......it took a little bit of thinking and not so easy to answer I might add.
The man is a student at the University of California San Diego. He was reported missing by his roommate last Friday, two days after he was taken to the hospital, UCSD police said. Campus police said the man notified officers on Saturday that he was OK and the missing-persons report was canceled.
Can't help thinking of all of the plans I had for my life.
Partners each pick a heart out of a Valentine's gift bag. Each partner counts their coins and writes it on their line. Then the partners decide if a greater than or less than sign should go in the circle. The player with the larger amount wins that round. After putting the coins back in their heart and putting it aside, they each draw another heart out of the bag and follow the same procedure for the second round. After 5 rounds, the player who won the most rounds is the winner! Just make sure when you put the coins in the hearts that you make them all different amounts. You don't need numbers on the hearts unless you want to make an answer key.
Sometimes in life we drift apart from people we were once close with. This can be healthy. Surround yourself with people who love you and allow you to be the person you are destined to be. Do not let someone else’s worry and despair get you down. Rise to the moment and show your inner greatness to the world.
Caitlin Prescott was taken away from her family at infancy leaving her no memory of her actual family. Twenty four years later Kate Montgomery is happy with her mother and a new job but this job will come with a cost. Kate will find herself with a stalker watching her every move and her past will start coming uncover but Kate will not be alone as she will have her bodyguard.
Keeping the room organized and functional will help you in the long run. Hranowsky wisely adds a daybed to the nursery's design. It will certainly come in handy for those middle of the night awakenings.
#SeanSpeak
I have to admit when I received The Drain Claw for review I was skeptical. It just appeared to be too simple- as in so simple it wouldn't work. However my husband grabbed it and was immediately fascinated. Being a handy man type of guy he is much more aware of tools, gadgets and how they work. He was actually excited by it. So excited it disappeared from my grasp because he ran off to use it.
I took a few more. Click…click…
I ask him if he thinks black South Africans have a right to this land.
As she was hanging there, and I was trying to not cry/laugh until I peed myself, the husband came down and did a visible double-take. I shot him a "shut the holy fuck up and don't say a word or I will gut you like a God damned fish" look, and helped her disentangle herself. She then, generously, offered to help ME into the device, because it "really would make your back feel better!"
Wed, Sep 19 Los Angeles, CA Gibson Amphitheatre Fri, May 11
Hello friends!! It's time for a new challenge at Lasting Memories!! We're going on a treasure hunt this week! We're challenging you to scrap about something you Treasure and tell us the story behind it. This could be Family, a Vacation spot, your home a piece of jewelry etc. JULIE is also giving away:
Antibes is half way between Nice and Cannes on the Mediterranean coast - just that descriptor alone makes me swoon. On top of this you'll find an enormous port, cobblestone streets and stone walls (ramparts) from the 1500s.
204) loud laughter and loud kids when the neighbours popped in for coffee tonight
Afnan Barqawi, Wafa Salameh and Eyad Shtaiwe’s artwork would draw one closer for having shared the same theme which is “Women”, each expressed it differently though. Wafa’s Salameh on participating in this event said “It was my very first time exhibiting my artwork to the real world, not online, and it was awesome!! I was so happy so that i felt it was like my wedding day, seriously!” Eyad Shtaiwe on commenting on his artwork said that “It is all based on the concept that women are half the society”. One would look with curiosity to make those sense of the partitions in his paintings as to explain such concept.
Plus they are super-model hot.
I wet
The Upper West Sider, who has a Ph.D. in biomedical science specializing in pharmacology, was unemployed and had all but given up on finding work in her preferred field of academia when she joined the movement in October.
All of this would mean…
However, following the civil rights movement of the mid 1960s it became illegal for businesses and private clubs to exclude people because of their race and instead of changing with the times and permitting non-whites entry into the Crystal Swim Club the owners elected to shut it down. The pools were filled with ashes and discarded debris trucked in from nearby Buckeye Steel Castings Company... like filling them with the cremated remains of a disappearing era.
Finally, Shugborough-Tweedle have created a single-use disposable pen for suicidal people. Each carries enough ink for one letter, and it writes wonderfully. Sadly, though, I found that it does tend to run out quickly if you ramble on about how you thought your life would get better once you’d had the patio refitted and nobody noticed your new hairstyle even after they told you to make more of an effort if you wanted to make Janice jealous after she ran off with Marcus, although she shouldn’t blame herself because before you met her your life was a barrel of rotten pigs’ trotters and she’ll always be close to your heart.
1/2 cup miso
DiS: The album's title, Valtari, translates as "Roller" in English. Is there any significance or concept in relation to the rest of the record as far as the title goes?
Every year our Buddhist group offers a three months course to study Buddhism here in India. The course is serious and I have previously multiple times checked out the curriculum. I don't think there is a better opportunity like this to study Buddhism with some of the highest and most respectable teachers in the field. I didn't make it to partake in the course this year, but will keep it in mind for the future. It must be possible to create a life which supports more freedom for ones studies and spirituality. The students live here at the center and study all things Buddhism, including learning Tibetan language. At the end of the three months course a public course is held for seven days, also with teachings. This is the part that I am partaking right now. The course is a combination of studies and days of initiations by our head lama - a rare and special honor, following a long Tibetan tradition within Buddhism. My days have been pretty full with teachings and not much free time. I was able to get a space here in the Institute with a super nice American girl, Ryan. She is one of the whole semester long students and kindly let me crash in her room. I have the highest appreciation for all the 60 people who came here from all over, who interrupted their lives back home only to focus on studying Buddhism in the solitude, only for their own development. What a commitment!!! In between I have been able to check out Delhi a bit and must say I like it. I can't talk about the poverty I have seen and some of the conditions within people are living here every day. I can't talk about it simply because I don't have words for it. I choose not to ignore it either and in between somewhere I ended up in my own experience of acceptance and just taking in without taking it on. And then the space is provided for the actual experience. I am pretty brave in terms of getting places and trying everything - including foods from the street. How could you not! It looks and smells wonderful. Everyone tells me I am going to get sick anyways, so why miss out on at least trying what looks new and interesting. The food is wonderful and gives me inspiration. The rest of the time we get fed at the center and spoiled by a wonderful Tibetan cooking team. I love Asian food!!! I have been to several markets and so far found whatever I was looking for. One adventure I must share. Yesterday I went to a tailor wanting to have some outfits made. I actually brought not enough nice cloth, only simply traveling gear. Once in Bhutan we will be meeting the royal family and I need a nice dress. So I was on a mission. The tailor was found, but I had no fabric yet. And so the tailor offered to lead me to the fabric store. I did not know he meant on his motorcycle. From here on only people who have been to India are going to appreciate the braveness included in the rest of the story. My friend and I were packed on the back of the motorcycle and off we went. Yes - there was 3 of us on one bike but that is totally normal here. We could have fit at least two more children and a dog. I knew I wasn't going to die in India, my heart was jumping for joy over the adventure ahead. We drove through town in the warm wind and dust, honking endlessly and trying not to run over or get run over by anyone else. The whole traffic chaos amazes me and somehow it works for everyone here. We did get to the fabric store and back safely. The tailor even bought us amazing sweets and coca cola on the way, apparently a part of his customer service or simply to be nice. I don't know. In the end he took my measurements and tomorrow I'll see what my hand tailored green long silk dress will look like. I am excited. Did I mention the total cost will be around 12USD and that includes the free motorcycle tax ride. Priceless.
Well if I do, at least I’ll have to walk a flight of stairs first.
Could Pinterest be the silver bullet for retailers on social media? Pinterest is clearly resonating with online consumers in a big way. To put it simply, customers who find a product via Pinterest are more likely to purchase it than those who find the product via other social networks.
After all the food on new year day, January 2nd should hold a morning of detox.
half
If you need to get Valentines for your child's class, Save the Children has designed Valentine's Cards which will go towards helping children in the U.S. living in poverty with health and reading programs in poor neighborhoods and schools! For $25, you'll get 30 limited-edition Valentine’s Day Cards (6 cards of each design), perfect for children to send to their classmates. This limited-edition set includes cards designed by your child's favorite children's book authors and illustrators: Ian Falconer (Olivia!), Kevin Henkes (Kitten’s First Full Moon), Leuyen Pham (Freckleface Strawberry), Brian Selznick (Wonderstruck) and Mo Willems (Don't Let the Pigeon Drive the Bus!). Consider investing in these children to give them a chance to break the lifelong cycle of poverty.
I go flipping
bottom row: macs and midriff at michael kors SS11, sexy tomboy at columbia road via annebernecker.com, flower markets.
His approach was anything but subtle though - using a Leica with a 25mm lens and a big flash, he'd simply walk up to groups and shoot them. But although he had some problems, he had less than you might expect. 'People were very amiable, and I don't think they really took me seriously,' he says. 'Plus I'd just take the shot and move on quickly. But I wanted to be aggressive and do that flash (of light) to capture what was going on. I was an available light photographer but the pubs were very dark so you couldn't shoot them like that - you'd need to really push the film and use a very slow shutter. I wanted to show it like it was, not just capture the atmosphere.'
I've waited a couple of weeks to write about The Sad One. Just trying to get a grasp on her story had created a writer's block of sorts, not only on her story, but on nearly everything I've tried to write since. If you're reading my blog for the first time, you can catch up on the original post here ~ and on parts 1, 2 and 3 by clicking here, here and here.
It felt like I hadn't seen the girl in FOREVER! She explained how she'd gone to the Army hospital with Luke, thinking they'd give him a breathing treatment. Then they transferred him to a hospital with a children s department. And she rode behind the ambulance in her car. And when she parked and went into the hospital to see him, that they wouldn't let her. It took her 2 hours to be with her infant son again. Oh, she was NOT happy.
Ovingham is a parish and village which lies on the River Tyne 10 miles east of Hexham. The modern parish covers an area of approximately three square kilometres on a terrace above the north bank of the river. The underlying geology of the parish is limestone.
a) Scream and chase after them with no weapon or phone.
Therefore I will be giving you this information via a good old fashion blog post!
Morello: Let’s save the best for last. Phreak, what do you know about Rammus?
This post is all over the place.
Khar said though the resolution was an isolated move by a few individuals, it “was contrary to the principles of the UN Charter and international law”. The resolution was also against the “very fundamentals of the longstanding Pakistan-US relations”, she said.
5. Chevrolet Volt, 2,289
Hummingbirds zipped through the air. For most of my kind, the one hundred and twenty-fifth birthday wasn't a big deal, but for me it fell during the year of Reparation. It signified the beginning, or the end.
Queen Elizabeth’s mother Anne Boleyn, herself had been accused of witchcraft on the specious ground that a sixth finger was growing on her fifth finger. Moreover, she had a prominent mole on her neck. The queen, being a woman and the daughter of a victim, had a lenient view on witchcraft. Also, she was learning Astrology from John Dee. This, perhaps, explained her leniency.
caught. I’m tired of people with a sense of entitlement, rich or poor.
Today was one of those days. I lost count of the "but whys" after about 200. But as I held and rocked my 33lb 3.5 year old to sleep tonight, stroking her hair and kissing on those sweet cheeks of hers, I muttered: "because I love you and want the best for you, little girl." And that is my constant and consistent prayer - that all I'd do for my children would be from a place of pure love. Because they deserve that from their mommy.
I’m at the picnic spot at Weary Bay beach. It’s just after sunset and I can see the Southern Cross in the sky. Every time I see the ‘Cross, I think of Lillian and all my other kids in Rocky. And Ella, our Grand-daughter. I feel their beautiful souls and hope they know that I love them so.
The views expressed in this article do not necessarily reflect the views of enewsWorld or its affiliated networks.
Are those wedding dress reality shows going to be RUINED now when they feature two men getting married, or two women?
Okinawa! Bulletstorm Travelers
Can you believe it, K'nex is 20 years old this year! They're celebrating their 20th anniversary all year, so check out their 20th anniversary page for news of new K'nex sets (including re-releases of their classic sets), contests and sweepstakes.
tracking herself into a disorientating schizo-chorale
If the people want to win their liberty and above all their freedom they have to first know whom the enemy is. People don't. Therefore the battle is already lost. The biggest challenge ahead for people is not removing the NWO/elites, but understanding their enemy and waking up to stop believing the emperor's fully clothed. They won't, as I've said time and time again, they've been altered. They accept things in society, as not being any problem today that in the past were greatly frowned upon. This is conditioning. This is the altering of society. This is the demolition of cultures, traditions, morals and taboos, in order to lay the foundations of the new world society, one with one culture, one race (and the separate race of the elites), a moral-less society with no taboos, where paedophilia, necrophilia, government euthanasia, organ removal and murder will all be perfectly legal within society. This is where we're going and we'll be there very soon.
You know what I mean about going Jelly Brained? I sometimes find myself:
Devil’s Kiss was set in London, my home town. It was easy to get the atmosphere of the narrow streets and ancient alleys, because I’d walked them in the day, in the night, the summertime and dead of winter. That set the standard. When I did the first draft of Dark Goddess I hadn’t been to Russia, and the editors complained it read like I’d taken my notes out of a guidebook, which was true. I couldn’t fake the setting. You might be able to do that if the place isn’t real, but I’d chosen to use only real locations in this series, so needed to play by those rules as well as I could.
I have two more pages and the cover to do and then I'm all finished with the book!
INDEXG
Here's Julia in her home-from-the-hospital outift. It was an outfit I picked up at a thrift shop before she was born. My newborn stuff was always borrowed because I was always surprised to have a girl. This is the last time I will try to squeeze her into it, though. She was a pretty big newborn. ;) It's so funny because all the doctors and nurses who see her say, "Oh, you're such a big girl!" And I say, "No, she's so little!" I guess she's big compared to a six or seven pound newborn but she's tiny compared to my 28 lb Tali. We go in on Thursday for her two week check. I wonder if she's up to 10 lbs by now.
“We dropped the package, when we got attacked back there,” replied Johan.
Do you have any phobias? Some fears incapacitate people to the point that they can't leave their house, take a shower or function. Some fears make people wear gloves, hats, strange clothing or strings on their fingers to keep them "brave."
You'll want to make sure and comment on all of the stops on the hop today lots of fun surprises tucked along the way. Now on with my Halloween Bat Express...
…It changes our attitude toward them and affects our relationship with them.
Pantheon of Gods.
Another real issue that I think we need to address is that the proposal is that a patent will qualify for the patent box in full from the date of grant. You can use the UK and EP patent. This is certainly going to create a much greater demand for the early grant of national UK patents and we need to be on to it now. I have long been an advocate of the combined search and examination procedure which results in both early grant and enough information to decide whether PCT and other foreign patent protection is justified. Of course, it's not that often a patented product generates much profit in its very early years. That, surely, is the point of the patent. The innovative company needs the patent to secure a longer term monopoly in order to make a profit. Now, the government proposes to allow innovative companies to keep a good deal more of that profit. Nice.
14th April – Town Hall, The Street, Newtown. 20:00
2 Tablespoons of extra virgin olive oil
So, the segment opens with someone basically rolling up their sleeves to get something off their chest, we get a brief grumble, and then a logical counter-argument that leads to a seemingly understood idea behind Mog Madness. And that’s it.
and tell her that I love her
“Tending the holy” has really struck me as I continue to ponder that simple phrase…..
Last Thursday Ruche released their Spring & Summer Guide. They filled their little magazine with DIY projects from their customers and readers. I was fortunate enough to have my DIY Tassels featured! Here is the tutorial again! I hope you enjoy and take the time to create a little tassel banner for your summer entertaining!
Kim must lose more than 128 to beat Jeremy and win!
Well, let me tell you about the way she looked
We were certainly a cross section of New York, but hey.
I will not fall
I'm sure I'm sowing the seeds for more Party disasters.
Don’t get me wrong, I’m not getting it from anyone here… It’s just that I’ve been thinking about stuff and well… I feel kinda lonely. It’s not anyone that’s neglecting me or what not, but I think it’s just me. I’ve kinda alienated myself from the rest of the world in my own ways, I’ve shut some things out from the world and have chosen not to voice anything out. Perhaps it’s not that I don’t wanna tell anyone about it, but it’s just that I think it’s not that big a problem to have to tell someone else about it.
My husband went to join my brother in the corner.
Don Phin, Esq for the April 2012 issue of Rough Notes Magazine. Don is president of the HR That Works program used as a value-added by agencies nationwide.
Hauling a 5 year old to the middle of China for 4 months can have its drawbacks, I supppose. But looking back on it these many years later, I can’t remember what they are. And now that the 5 year old is a wonderful, curious and adventurous 27 year old, she’s providing us with grand excuses for trips to exotic locales.
“I am ready to commit myself to a full time job”.
Another truth we learn from this story is that God’s presence can positively affect every area of your life. In Genesis 39:3, everything Joseph did prospered. God’s presence in your life can positively affect you spiritually, physically, mentally, financially, socially and ministry-wise. This implies that the one who has God with him will observe that he or she is making progress in every area of life. 3 John 2 will be a reality in the life of such an individual. Yes, it is possible to be blessed all round! Usually, most believers notice God’s blessing in certain areas while some other areas are left out. The true mark of God’s tangible presence in your life is that every situation in your life responds positively to His Will. Using this standard, can you truly say that God is with you? When people observe the presence of God in a man, they will like to draw close to him. People like to associate with rich, influential and successful people. Although Joseph entered Potiphar’s house as a slave, yet his master later became proud to be associated with him. Today! The presence of God upon your life will cause men and women, friends and foes to take pleasure in associating with you, in Jesus Christ Name! Amen!
12. Cumin seeds, 1 teaspoon.
I was also provided with a catalog and I took some pictures so I can show you some other items they offer Stella and Dot.
It was in that moment that Jonathan decided to open up and tell his story. "My birth family visited me while I was in the orphanage. I have a photo we took as a family a week before you came to adopt me." Jonathan retrieved the secret photo and showed it to Sue. She observed how fit and happy the family looked, not at all like the "old and ailing" grandparents she had read about in Jonathan's pre-adoption descriptions. Jonathan explained that his birth family was against the idea of Jonathan going to the U.S., out of fear they would never see him again. Jonathan, however, was excited. This was his chance to become rich and famous.
Then today I got an e-mail from a mom asking about adoptive breastfeeding. They are awaiting the word as to whether or not they have been matched and she is preparing to nurse. Wonderful! I checked out her blog and(it looked to me but I'm not sure) they have 4 beautiful biological children. They may suffer from infertility, they may not. They may be waiting for a special needs baby, they may be waiting for an AA male(both hard to place), but the thought crossed my mind of them "taking" a domestically adopted infant from a couple who could not have children biologically. Some people may wonder why they aren't adopting an older child from Russia, a special needs child from China or an AIDS orphan from Ethiopia, etc.
When you first start out, don’t be overambitious about your new venture. Start it small. Don’t pour your money into the unnecessary. Although you may still be getting a steady pay from your day job, be careful still of your finances. So take out the unnecessary and focus on the essentials.
Happy Birthday, Dave Gahan. I’m glad you didn’t die.
We gathered around Jason, looking like the Gorton's fisherman, our beacon in his yellow rain gear and our own personal gear check. Finally, about 20 minutes before the start, I went off for a one mile warm-up.
The bundle sells in the Gingerscraps store for $9.00. That is almost 20% off if you bought the pieces separately.
Collation: 10/10 No doubles, all inserts guaranteed and THEN SOME
7. Philip squared – Jonny Lang – “Still Rainin’”
Scott Morgan lists five reasons why civilians should never consent to a police search of their person or property. Evaluate the merits of his arguments among yourself.
The Dujardin’s performance is amazing and The Best Actor Award at Cannes that has given deserved. But it is thanks to the TV, which Dujardin has become famous. First thanks to the talent show “Graines de stars” and then to the TV miniseries “A gars une fille” (which inspired the Italian “Love Bugs”). There, next to what was to become his wife Alexandra Lamy, starred in nearly five episodes (every few minutes to sketch the life of a couple in their thirties) with a winning formula of humor and simplicity that ferry you to the movies.
I was a very good gurl this year and scored myself a video cam, tons-o-bath stuff, that pink tool kit I wanted, and other tidbits including some Tim Horton coffee and a Chapters Book store and a Tim's gift card....mmm mmm!
The belief that terrorists are simply evil implies that the threat requires unprecedented presidential power, even going beyond the scope of powers prescribed by the Constitution during a time of declared war. The ability to detain people and declare them outside of both the U.S. criminal law and the protections of international law is a problematic way to defend democratic freedoms, and, when used against Muslims, adds to their feelings of persecution. Declaring that well-established international law does not apply, adds to perceptions that the United States thinks it is above the laws it frequently insists other countries obey. Ignoring international law at this juncture also undercuts policies favoring the development of international law to deal with a growing number of disputes caused by a shrinking and increasingly interconnected global village. A solution to terrorism is to follow international law as it has been agreed upon.
Requires (2) 32 watt T8 linear energy-efficient fluorescent bulbs
Cath
This week marks the anniversary of that fateful fight, also known as the Battle of Long Island, and I thought I’d take a look at some of the Revolutionary era taverns and inns of Brooklyn — since some of them saw a bit of the action during that conflict.
2 large egg yolk
There are 3 issues left in the current subscription cycle
When Bruce Watson called and asked me to sing for Big Country, it was something I didn’t need to think twice about. I’m looking forward to meeting all the fans again and playing a part in keeping the spirit of Stuart Adamson alive and celebrating the music of a band I have loved from near and afar for the whole of my adult life”.
I mean ... do you?
“I’m so blue.”
the remainder of the weekend and on to next week. :) Now on to
Milk to thin out the glaze
1 c. powdered milk
There were two other possessions during the evening (possibly more, but I was only sure of these two). During one of the dances, I saw the African woman seated in a chair near the altar, seemingly frozen in an odd pose with one of her arms arched above her head, the other out to the side, and her torso leaning over to her left. Shortly after that she was dancing in a dazed way, and had to be supported by one of the Mambo’s friends.
Olsen J. Risk of exposure to teratogens amongst laboratory staff and painters. Dan Med Bull 1983; 30: 24-28.
that Lady Spring cares for me—
How, exactly, do you forget you have a baby?
So I can grow plants, it’s just the hydrangea bush that hates me. I’ve now tried three versions and only one has done fairly (and fairly is subjective) well. I dream of bushes like this:
And now there's Brindle and TommyCat.
10. Hercules- This was on every morning at 6:30am before I went to school
"...filling the vast space was the gargantuan figure of the dark basilisk...The wings that gave it elegance and a certain malevolent beauty were constricted, half-folded like a crumpled fan.The thick vanes that stretched the leathery membrane of the wings stood out like cords of vein on an old man’s hand; they had the same blueish tinge. Rej was careful to avoid the basilisk’s eyes- it was said that the coal-black eyes of basilisk brought death in its stare... Somehow the basilisk elongated its slick, slug dark tail and, using it for balance, partially fanned its wings so that the jet of flames that issued from its mouth burned hotter and more brilliantly. Rej watched in horror as five or six men fell from the cliffs on to the stone beneath. The flame licked at their hair and clothing, the blazing fire illumined their open mouthed terror as they fell, and only the roaring and the the piss-freezing hissing of the creature drowned out their screams and the sound of the impact of their fall."
Now go back and make sure every single word is right, and the sentences are honed.
It is questionable that the HHC would be so eager to contract with Sodexo considering a spotty record on contractual matters and workers-rights. Furthermore, it is my understanding that Sodexo plans to move many of these existing positions to Rochester, which would mean a loss of jobs for City employees.
I say you're nothing pal,
See you all there.
AnnCrabs
I’ve been finding some interesting titbits scattered around WordPress, things that interest me or that chime with my views on writing. I’ll try and post some up regularly under this new series.
"OMG. Why are you here?" I was taken aback. It was almost, what, 4:30 a.m.?
They must blanket the skies. And if I'm elected, they will.
xoxo Wendy
In fact, I fainted with my EYES OPEN during my first tattoo at age 21. The only way they knew I was out was that my lips turned blue. I’ve grown out of my phobia a bit with practice from getting subsequent tattoos, but there’s something irrationally icky about medical needles, specifically. Especially those that just stay in there. Gross.
If you want to awaken all of humanity,
They spent the weekend with me, and asked Granna can we have a Tea Party like we used to.
It appears to be the case that, on net balance (and we must generalize here to say anything useful at all), the top-down sweep is not only more important than the bottom-up sweep in criminal investigation, it is very significantly more important than the bottom-up sweep. Decades of unrealistic police dramas notwithstanding, police work does not tend to consist of Sherlock Holmes-style deduction, where the slightest clues are incorporated into a brilliantly accurate and irrefutable account of how the crime took place. The ability of the police to identify strong suspects for a crime (i.e. conduct a top-down sweep that throws up legitimate targets of inquiry) and then assemble as strong a case as they can out of the evidence they have (push the case as far as they can with the newly-focused bottom-up sweeps and interrogation based thereupon) is largely determinative of whether or not they can bring charges against careful criminals. Fools who blunder through open tins of paint at the scene of their crimes and then stroll the twenty yards home may not be covered by this generalization, but I am not especially concerned with them. The criminal with a sense of professional pride and concern for the craft is the central concern of this essay.
4) Your Age and Profession;
Unicorns? I’m in! What's a unicorn?
Scrum Half; Mike Phillips (Wales)
At Pier 83 at the west end of 42nd Street, a couple of hundred of us took turns posing for the photo of ourselves with the boat behind us, then shuffled up the gangplank and took our seats. ‘And please ladies and gentlemen, we ask you not to stand and obstruct the view of others.’
Yet I'm not feeling that way about me right now. Can someone say "attachment" again, please? I have to "allow" me to be ME: all those qualities that our love brought up in ME. I have to allow those in again, without the NEED for the relationship. Tricky stuff.
If we're speculating about names, I can only hope Luis Castillo has been bought out of his contract and will be released. I can only hope Jeff Francoeur is part of trade discussions with Seattle. Ollie Perez disappearing from the roster is a long shot. But I can dream....can't I?
Hope you have a great weekend
In other, other news I have a crappy little non-entity of a cough that makes me sound like Richard Attenborough in his portrayal of John Christie in 10, Rillington Place. Luckily for him, it only manifested itself during moments of heightened sexual activity. Sadly, for me, heightened sexual activity is possibly the only time the symptoms desist.
- Fresh whole white mushroom 454 g package $1.98 each (Canada)
6.Add salt and 2 cup of water.close the lid of pan and cook for 10 min.
is the place to be for people watching
She found his strong hb nearly right away - it ranged between 140 and 145. She measured my belly and said I was right on track. And I only gained 2 pounds since my last appointment. I asked about the weight issue - whether or not I was on track - and she only spoke about it because I asked. And confirmed that I am exactly where I am supposed to be. Their records indicate that I have gained 14 1/2 pounds, though she noted that I had probably gained a few before my first appointment, which was at 10 weeks, I think.
11. Regresa A Mi
Don't act right when you know you're dead wrong
The RAF warned that people in south-east England will notice an increase in air activity at certain times, in particular this weekend.
Whose crimes have gone unpunished now
Ed took me around the city of Nantes, which is very modern and artsy. First we went to super cool graffiti exposition at a contemporary art museum, called Faire le Mur, which means to sneak out. They had quite some interesting and unique pieces.
And, Shazam! A foldaway computer/navigation terminal. Now junior can participate in his classes (by way of video conference) without distraction. But more importantly, someone can monitor the appropriate weather patterns, perform diagnostics of the various on board systems, etc. Presumably freeing the pilot to concentrate on the sky in front of him.
Honestly, I don’t even want to dignify that with a response. I’ll just say that anyone who has spent any time at all reading my blog knows that I am far from bitter or angry about Finn’s diagnosis.
here instead.
Because the window had no glass.
Happy birthday, Alexei! I'll be taking a break from the blog today and tomorrow, so I can hang out with my handsome husband and buy him fish sandwiches and sea-salt fries. (He doesn't like cake.)
My Daily 5 sessions are approximately 25 minutes in length, but we started the year in just 3 minute blocks as we built our stamina. I found this great resource on Pinterest and can't wait to tweak it a bit to use it next year:
swing to snatch to swing to clean to strict press to one arm racked squat.
Remember that old coffee maker commercial? The wife is sleeping and the husband is trying to wake her up to get his coffee made. She rolls over and says grumpily. "I'm making COFFee!" and then puts a pillow over her head? I guess the coffee maker was set up the night before and on a timer... I don't know. I didn't pay that much attention. Just interested in the wife getting to sleep in really...
After leaving his statewide position in FFA, Dodds became involved with SGA as the director of information technology, a position he has held for two years. The university community recently elected him as SGA president for the 2012-2013 and he will represent students as a regent on WKU’s governing board.
“The Devil of Dreams is Black”
The idea that our minds and emotions play a critical role in our health—a fundamental premise in integrative medicine—is far from new. Many ancient healing systems emphasize the interconnection between mind and body in healing, including Hippocrates, the father of Western medicine, who taught that good health depends on a balance of mind, body, and environment.
Candied pecans
And after two amazing weeks it is almost time to say goodbye to Creative Chemistry just the wrap up today and then thats it there isn’t anymore
The 3 GFCF varieties are Dark Chocolate, Raspberry Dark Chocolate, and Coffee Bean Dark Chocolate. Here is a picture of them so you know what they look like when you go looking for them in your store.
So, go out and vote Welch? The other guys either aren't trying, or are kind of obnoxious.
Margaret Fulton is an Australian living legend. She first brought the world of international cuisine to Australia back in the late 1960's and early 1970's. This was my first ever cookbook I bought as a 'grown up' in my late teens. I don't refer to it as much anymore. Most of the things are very retro and still great to make but I keep it as a reminder of my just how my cooking journey began.
It doesn’t matter where you end up. It’s how you get there.
74) Some of my favorite movies are "Shaun of the Dead," "The Mosquito Coast," "The Year of Living Dangerously," "Lost in Translation," and "Until the End of the World."
We tried to talk it out. I tried to ease his fears. I told him we could even push back the wedding for a max of two years even, but I couldn’t lose my best friend and we could get through it together and that this change would be scary for me too.
-1 stick of butter (1/2 cup)
it's easy to do when it's population: me
He also revealed he became a citizen in 2009 and boasted about having people in the PAP grassroots organizations:
67. Guys Do It -- Mindy McCready
WACAP has had a long history with the Luoyang orphanage, going back to the early 1990s when the agencies head, Janice Neilson, formed a mutually beneficial relationship with the orphanage director, Pei Zhong Hai. Over the course of the next seventeen years, WACAP arranged funding for the Luoyang orphanage, and Pei provided children for adoption.
Acacia*
Today has been a strange day.. There was a reasonable amount of anticipation and its fair to say that there was a measure of the anticlimax about it too.
all on his own. He has the broadest view of the world and how to
5 changes
We are on a gravel road, a turn-off near a highway overpass. Bumpity bump. Going up hill.
I thought to myself, "God, what have I been doing?"
Small Soup Tureens(I have 2:))
Singer, Eurythmics/solo
mainly, she has been trolling stylish & colorful magazines,
The link: Savage Island, a four-day eastward sail from Chennai and home to the most fearsome legend in the Bay of Bengal; a cannibalistic tribe of natives who ritually destroy anyone unfortunate or foolish enough to set foot on their tropical paradise island. But one megalomaniac wants to sell that paradise to the world. Unfortunately, the natives have other ideas.
7.Fosters home for imaginary friends Although this one wasn’t created in the 90′s I still love it with all my heart and I still watch it, I think they are still making episodes?
up my cooked Spanish sausage
McGuinness makes one salient point in this article: that "free" music isn't simply free, but relies on the availability of high-speed internet service, the provision of which is a major source of revenue for various large telecomm corporations. True enough. And he's also justified in claiming that access to free music and other similar content has been one of the major engines that has led to such a growth in the demand for such services.
I like the way the Chinese calligraphy is running down the cover near the spine in the traditional top to bottom/right to left format. I actually wonder if the script is a form of Nu Shu (Secret women's script used for centuries in China).
Two of the tiers came from our car, we had to get new ones so instead of being charged £1 per tyre for them to be disposed off, we took them home in the boot. The others were picked up from a pile of dumped ones down the road.
There was intense publicity in India about the assaults, which included the stabbing murder of accounting graduate for his mobile phone, and Canberra conceded that some of the violence was racially motivated.- AFP
My mother, born in 1916, grew up in Texas when not everyone had cars. Her stories were so vivid that when I visited Austin as a little girl, I was shocked to see highrises and paved roads. My great-great aunt was born during the reign of Queen Victoria. I remember seeing pictures of her – her long dress swept the floor, she held a parasol. My natural curiosity made me want to learn more about her dress, her hairstyle, and the time she lived in. Why did no one smile for the camera in those days?
I first met L decades ago when we were both around 30, at some damn thing at the university president’s house; I have no doubt that one of my immediate subconscious impressions as I shook her hand was that something needed to be done with those lips. And if I could play back the mental tape of that meeting, I wouldn’t be at all surprised to find that my lizard brain was showing movies of L’s lips opening for my cock, taking me in, tasting, licking, sucking me until I shot gallons of come down her throat while she gazed up at me adoringly, there on the president’s patio overlooking the fountain and azaleas. I don’t remember thinking that, but it wouldn’t surprise me because men and their lizard brains are just that way, and her lips are just that splendid.
When so many top financial professionals are freaking out like this, perhaps the rest of us should start paying attention.
Wool – From sheep. Used in clothing. Ram lambs and old “wool” sheep are slaughtered for their meat. Sheep are transported without food or water, in extreme heat and cold. Legs are broken, eyes injured, etc. Sheep are bred to be unnaturally woolly, also unnaturally wrinkly, which causes them to get insect infestations around the tail areas. The farmer’s solution to this is the painful cutting away of the flesh around the tail (called ?mulesing?). “Inferior” sheep are killed. When shearing the sheep, they are pinned down violently and sheared roughly. Their skin is cut up. Every year, hundreds of thousands of shorn sheep die from exposure to cold. Natural predators of sheep (wolves, coyotes, eagles, etc.) are poisoned, trapped, and shot. In the U.S., overgrazing of cattle and sheep is turning more than 150 million acres of land to desert. “Natural” wool production uses enormous amounts of resources and energy (to breed, raise, feed, shear, transport, slaughter, etc., the sheep). Derivatives: Lanolin, Wool Wax, Wool Fat. Alternatives: cotton, cotton flannel, synthetic fibers, ramie, etc.
Sure, I battle loneliness, fight the desire to hide in seclusion and struggle with the cravings for intimate connection. But after the last three years, I’m rather enjoying the stillness. It’s simple, it’s peaceful, and it’s calm. Even my dog has grown from this all. From the time I got him, he battled with anxiety. I couldn’t leave him in the house alone without him howling and hollering. I had to put him in the bathroom when I went to work so he wouldn’t disturb the neighbors. But now, he simply goes to his bed and lays down when I leave. It’s as though he feels the shift in the energy at home.
...and then filled this felt 'envelope' with a layer of heavy cardboard...
Morning all! I was trying to create a completely different look with my Lattice dies with this one. I have used mostly black card and kraft card, coupled with a few other natural elements. I stamped my sentiment on kraft card and cut it with the lattice motif die and inked through the die with black soot distress ink to bring out both the lattice pattern and highlight the sentiment. I cut another one from black card and cut it in half to mount to the outside edge as a shadow accent. I used a patterned kraft card as a background and did a messy sewn edge on it, overlapping the lines a few times. I cut a piece of hessian and removed some of the strands to loosen the weave and mounted it behind my focal element. I had several grungeboard swirls in my craft stash. I painted them with black Eco-Green brand paint and mounted them on the bottom of my card. I added three flowers, one was made from cotton hemp ribbon which I fringed before rolling. One was made from the new silky crush ribbon which I rolled and the last one was one of our zipper flowers. I used some of the suede leaves with them. The entire piece was matted on to black card which I added some black PVA glue dots around the edge as a frame and accent. Hopefully this may appeal to those of you which like a little edgier style. I liked the fact that the dies could work well in this style as well as others.
can only be resolved by engaging in the political process, in order to
You guys have NO idea how excited I am. I have literally been dancing pretty much non-stop. And don't you worry, I have NOT forgotten my promise to post a video of me dancing.
As for that picture; right now, at this moment I am SO happy with the shot. It captures the beautiful delicacy of infants, the softness of sharing a sleepy-eyed moment and the heart-fluttering reverence of being alive and I can not think of a single thing to add to that.
Hugest of thanks to the 2 lovely ‘L’s :)xxx
And despite my objections,
is when the snipers, or “swat team”,
Cucumber - National Pickling - We've had good success with this variety in the past.
8. What I Wore Posts. While some people enjoy these, if you post more than one a week, I will not comment. For the record, yes, you dress WAY better than me and yes, you look amazing.
I was so proud of myself, friends: Yesterday I finally finished clearing out the space in the Studio that will become the Nursery (and hence the “Nursdio”). Success! Elation! Joy! Especially since the place looked like this (the “before” pics, unfortunately) when I started. In fact, I was all set to drag Matt in from spraying weeds outside to say “put the cradle up NOW…please” because I’m ready, people! Let’s get this Nursery in gear!
You breathe your sweet breath
1. Red potatoes or green cabbage, .49/lb. at Sun Harvest (through 3/17/11)
2.a specific instance of or propensity for such a feeling: an abnormal fear of heights.
Brynjolfsson says the trends are “troubling.” And they are global; some of the jobs that IT threatens, for example, are at electronics factories in China and transcription services in India. “This is not about replacing all work, but rather about tectonic shifts that have left millions much worse off and others much better off,” he says. While he doesn’t believe the problem is permanent, that’s of little solace to the millions out of work now, and they may not be paid at their old rates even when they do find new jobs. “Over the longer term, they will develop new skills, or entrepreneurs will figure out ways of making use of their skills, or wages will drop, or all three of those things will happen,” he says. “But in the short run, your old set of skills that created a lot of value are not useful anymore.”
Riding the wave of the high
Though troubled by his assessment, I secretly loved the excuse to hunker down and perfect my coloring skill and, even better, spend more quality time with my cherished box of 64 Crayola crayons. I was fascinated by the range of colors and names, and considered being a Crayon Namer when I grew up.
Catherine, writes biographer Robert K. Massie, was the equal of her illustrious predecessor Peter the Great – “his only equal – in vision, strength of purpose and achievement during the centuries that Russia was ruled by tsars, emperors and empresses.”
All I can say is the film filled me with joy and the 11 year old boy from Bramley would have cackled with glee just as much as I did when the Avengers eventually assembled. Hulk smashed, Iron man wise cracked, Thor was pompous and god-like, Cap was idealistic and out of time and the newbies Black Widow and Hawkeye followed up the rear. I loved the film and I don’t mind saying so. It has its faults but Joss Wheedon does it justice and that’s all a geek can ask, he clearly cares about the characters as much as the action and that delivers a state of the art superhero film. And the bad guy is good too which helps.
General comment: This reminds me of Highland park 12/18 or Glenfarclas 21. Not really my style of sherried whisky but nothing particularly off either.
After breakfast we went to walmart for a couple of things and came back out with a cartfull of stuff.
"The Wildhawk is no danger." Pevan fought back the urge to scream at Notia. Kos hovered at the edge of vision, poised on the cusp of running. Defying a direct order because of the would-be Four Knot's meddling. "The Wilder that can make an eight-mile Gateway into the Warding Hall itself, that's a danger, and that's what was helping Van Raighan. Never mind that he's at large again, and his trail is going cold." She turned to Kos. "What are you waiting for? Move!"
It's time. I have been walking a journey in my own quiet way for over seven months now. I'm ready to start sharing some parts of it. For this piece, I had wanted to wait until I hit a certain personal goal before I shared, but after some months of set-backs, I thought perhaps I should post and perhaps that would bring me some more... I don't know... accountability? Support? Both? Something else?
For now, leave this set to UART while a sketch is running. When uploading a sketch to the board, this needs to be on DLINE. Always turn off your GPS shield board before changing this switch to avoid damage.
That would be the same Timothy Geithner who is now Secretary of the Treasury. Wheee! Yes, let's leave keeping an eye on the henhouse to the foxes and weasels who are familiar with things like this. I mean, Congress deals with trade issues and foreign policy and treaty negotiations and federal law, but understanding banks would be just too difficult for them. Tee hee! Macroeconomics are hard!
